Missouri, session 2026, HB2273.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 43.656, 56.265, 67.2540, 168.071, 190.142, 210.1080, 210.1505,
211.326, 324.012, 324.035, 329.050, 337.618, 339.100, 455.050, 542.301, 566.010, 566.147,
566.148, 566.149, 566.150, 566.151, 566.155, 566.211, 566.218, 567.030, 573.010, 573.023,
573.025, 573.035, 573.037, 573.038, 573.050, 573.052, 573.110, 573.112, 573.215, 589.015,
589.042, 589.400, 589.414, 590.050, 595.045, 610.131, 650.120, and 660.520, RSMo, are
repealed and fifty-two new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 27.117,
43.656, 56.265, 67.2540, 168.071, 190.142, 210.1080, 210.1505, 211.326, 324.012, 324.035,
329.050, 337.618, 339.100, 455.050, 537.054, 542.301, 566.010, 566.147, 566.148, 566.149,
566.150, 566.151, 566.155, 566.201, 566.211, 566.218, 567.030, 573.010, 573.023, 573.025,
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 2
573.035, 573.037, 573.038, 573.050, 573.052, 573.110, 573.112, 573.114, 573.215, 573.570,
573.575, 589.015, 589.042, 589.400, 589.414, 590.050, 595.045, 610.131, 650.120, 660.520,
and 660.845, to read as follows:
27.117. A prosecuting or circuit attorney may request assistance from the
attorney general, or one of his or her assistants, to assist in the prosecution of a violation
of sections 573.570 or 573.575, where the offense occurred in more than one jurisdiction
of the state. The prosecuting or circuit attorney may request any resource or capability
of the attorney general when prosecuting such cases.
43.656. It is hereby found and declared that:
(1) With the widespread use of computers, the internet and electronic devices to
commit crimes and the critical lack of resources at state and local levels;
(2) Modern day criminals have learned to exploit the internet and electronic
communication to leverage computer technology to reach a virtually unlimited number of
victims while maintaining a maximum level of anonymity[,]. Computer crimes will continue
to mount, especially in, but not limited to, the areas of child [pornography] sexual abuse
material and sexual offenses involving children, consumer fraud and harassment;
(3) It is necessary for the protection of the citizens of this state that provisions be
made for the establishment of the Missouri regional computer forensics lab to prevent and
reduce computer, internet and other electronically based crimes.
56.265. 1. The county prosecuting attorney in any county, other than in a chartered
county, shall receive an annual salary computed using the following schedule, when
applicable. The assessed valuation factor shall be the amount thereof as shown for the year
immediately preceding the year for which the computation is done.
(1) For a full-time prosecutor the prosecutor shall receive compensation equal to the
compensation of an associate circuit judge;
(2) For a part-time prosecutor:
Assessed Valuation Amount
$18,000,000 to 40,999,999 $37,000
41,000,000 to 53,999,999 38,000
54,000,000 to 65,999,999 39,000
66,000,000 to 85,999,999 41,000
86,000,000 to 99,999,999 43,000
100,000,000 to 130,999,999 45,000
131,000,000 to 159,999,999 47,000
160,000,000 to 189,999,999 49,000
190,000,000 to 249,999,999 51,000

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 3
250,000,000 to 299,999,999 53,000
300,000,000 or more 55,000
2. Two thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable to any prosecuting attorney
only if the prosecuting attorney has completed:
(1) At least twenty hours of classroom instruction each calendar year relating to the
operations of the prosecuting attorney's office when approved by a professional association of
the county prosecuting attorneys of Missouri unless exempted from the training by the
professional association. The professional association approving the program shall provide a
certificate of completion to each prosecuting attorney who completes the training program
and shall send a list of certified prosecuting attorneys to the treasurer of each county or city
not within a county. Expenses incurred for attending the training session may be reimbursed
to the prosecuting attorney in the same manner as other expenses as may be appropriated for
that purpose; and
(2) One hour of sex and human trafficking training each calendar year
consistent with the guidelines established in section 210.1505. The provisions of this
subdivision shall become effective on January 1, 2027, and shall expire on December 31,
2031.
3. Each calendar year, five thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable to any
prosecuting attorney only if the prosecuting attorney has collected the data described in
subsection 2 of section 56.750 in a manner approved by the prosecutors coordinators training
council and makes the data described in subsection 2 of section 56.750 readily accessible to
the Missouri office of prosecution services. The Missouri office of prosecution services shall
provide a certificate of compliance to each prosecuting attorney who complies with this
subsection and shall send a list of any certified prosecuting attorney to the respective treasurer
of each county or city not within a county.
4. For each calendar year, three thousand dollars of the salary shall be payable to any
prosecuting attorney only if the prosecuting attorney has provided discovery to criminal
defense attorneys who have entered an appearance on behalf of a defendant in a manner
approved by the prosecutors coordinators training council. The Missouri office of
prosecution services shall provide a certificate of compliance to each prosecuting attorney
who complies with this subsection and shall send a list of any certified prosecuting attorney to
the respective treasurer of each county or city not within a county.
5. As used in this section, the term "prosecuting attorney" includes the circuit attorney
of any city not within a county.
6. The prosecuting attorney of any county which becomes a county of the first
classification during a four-year term of office or a county which passed the proposition

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 4
authorized by subsection 1 of section 56.363 shall not be required to devote full time to such
office pursuant to section 56.067 until the beginning of the prosecuting attorney's next term of
office or until the proposition otherwise becomes effective.
7. The provisions of section 56.066 shall not apply to full-time prosecutors who are
compensated pursuant to subdivision (1) of subsection 1 of this section.
67.2540. As used in sections 67.2540 to 67.2556, the following terms mean:
(1) "Adult cabaret", a nightclub, bar, restaurant, or similar establishment in which
persons regularly appear in a state of nudity, as defined in section 573.500, or seminudity in
the performance of their duties;
(2) "Employee", a person who is at least twenty-one years of age and who performs
any service on the premises of a sexually oriented business on a full-time, part-time, or
contract basis, whether or not the person is denominated an employee, independent
contractor, agent, or otherwise, and whether or not said person is paid a salary, wage, or other
compensation by the operator of said business. The term employee does not include a person
exclusively on the premises for repair or maintenance of the premises or equipment on the
premises, or for the delivery of goods to the premises;
(3) "Nudity" or a "state of nudity", the showing of the human male or female genitals,
pubic area, vulva, anus, anal cleft or anal cleavage with less than a fully opaque covering, the
showing of the female breast with less than a fully opaque covering of any part of the nipple,
or the showing of the covered male genitals in a discernibly turgid state;
(4) "Nuisance", any place in or upon which lewdness, assignation, or prostitution is
conducted, permitted, continued, or exists, or any place, in or upon which lewd, indecent,
lascivious, or obscene films, or films designed to be projected for exhibition, are
photographed, manufactured, developed, screened, exhibited, or otherwise prepared or
shown, and the personal property and contents used in conducting and maintaining any such
place for any such purpose. The provisions of this section shall not affect any newspaper,
magazine, or other publication entered as second class matter by the post office department;
(5) "Person", an individual, proprietorship, partnership, corporation, association, or
other legal entity;
(6) "Seminude" or in a "seminude condition", a state of dress in which opaque
clothing fails to cover the genitals, anus, anal cleft or cleavage, pubic area, vulva, nipple and
areola of the female breast below a horizontal line across the top of the areola at its highest
point. Seminudity shall include the entire lower portion of the female breast, but shall not
include any portion of the cleavage of the human female breast exhibited by wearing apparel
provided the areola is not exposed in whole or part;
(7) "Sexually oriented business", an adult cabaret or any business which offers its
patrons goods of which a substantial or significant portion are sexually oriented material. It

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 5
shall be presumed that a business that derives thirty percent or less of its revenue from
sexually oriented materials is presumed not to be a sexually oriented business. No building,
premises, structure, or other facility that contains any sexually oriented business shall contain
any other kind of sexually oriented business;
(8) "Sexually oriented materials", any pictorial or three-dimensional material, or film,
motion picture, DVD, video cassette, or similar photographic reproduction, that depicts
nudity, sexual conduct, sexual excitement, or sadomasochistic abuse, as defined in section
573.010;
(9) "Specified criminal activity" includes the following offenses:
(a) Prostitution or promotion of prostitution; dissemination of obscenity; sale,
distribution, or display of harmful material to a minor; sexual performance by a child;
possession or distribution of child pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026;
possession or distribution of child sexual abuse material; public lewdness; indecent
exposure; indecency with a child; engaging in organized criminal activity; sexual assault;
molestation of a child; gambling prohibited under Missouri law; or distribution of a controlled
substance; or any similar offenses described in this subdivision under the criminal or penal
code of other states or countries;
(b) For which:
a. Less than two years have elapsed since the date of conviction or the date of release
from confinement imposed for the conviction, whichever is the later date, if the conviction is
of a misdemeanor offense;
b. Less than five years have elapsed since the date of conviction or the date of release
from confinement for the conviction, whichever is the later date, if the conviction is of a
felony offense; or
c. Less than five years have elapsed since the date of the last conviction or the date of
release from confinement for the last conviction, whichever is the later date, if the convictions
are of two or more misdemeanor offenses or combination of misdemeanor offenses occurring
within any twenty-four-month period;
(c) The fact that a conviction is being appealed shall not prevent a sexually oriented
business from being considered a nuisance and closed under section 67.2546;
(10) "Specified sexual activities" includes the following acts:
(a) The fondling or other erotic touching of human genitals, pubic region, buttocks,
anus, or female breasts;
(b) Sex acts, actual or simulated, including intercourse, oral copulation, masturbation,
or sodomy; or
(c) Excretory functions as part of or in connection with any of the activities set forth
in this subdivision.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 6
168.071. 1. The state board of education may refuse to issue or renew a certificate, or
may, upon hearing, discipline the holder of a certificate of license to teach for the following
causes:
(1) A certificate holder or applicant for a certificate has pleaded to or been found
guilty of a felony or crime involving moral turpitude under the laws of this state, any other
state, of the United States, or any other country, whether or not sentence is imposed;
(2) The certification was obtained through use of fraud, deception, misrepresentation
or bribery;
(3) There is evidence of incompetence, immorality, or neglect of duty by the
certificate holder;
(4) A certificate holder has been subject to disciplinary action relating to certification
issued by another state, territory, federal agency, or country upon grounds for which discipline
is authorized in this section; or
(5) If charges are filed by the local board of education, based upon the annulling of a
written contract with the local board of education, for reasons other than election to the
general assembly, without the consent of the majority of the members of the board that is a
party to the contract.
2. A public school district may file charges seeking the discipline of a holder of a
certificate of license to teach based upon any cause or combination of causes outlined in
subsection 1 of this section, including annulment of a written contract. Charges shall be in
writing, specify the basis for the charges, and be signed by the chief administrative officer of
the district, or by the president of the board of education as authorized by a majority of the
board of education. The board of education may also petition the office of the attorney
general to file charges on behalf of the school district for any cause other than annulment of
contract, with acceptance of the petition at the discretion of the attorney general.
3. The department of elementary and secondary education may file charges seeking
the discipline of a holder of a certificate of license to teach based upon any cause or
combination of causes outlined in subsection 1 of this section, other than annulment of
contract. Charges shall be in writing, specify the basis for the charges, and be signed by legal
counsel representing the department of elementary and secondary education.
4. If the underlying conduct or actions which are the basis for charges filed pursuant
to this section are also the subject of a pending criminal charge against the person holding
such certificate, the certificate holder may request, in writing, a delayed hearing on advice of
counsel under the fifth amendment of the Constitution of the United States. Based upon such
a request, no hearing shall be held until after a trial has been completed on this criminal
charge.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 7
5. The certificate holder shall be given not less than thirty days' notice of any hearing
held pursuant to this section.
6. Other provisions of this section notwithstanding, the certificate of license to teach
shall be revoked or, in the case of an applicant, a certificate shall not be issued, if the
certificate holder or applicant has been found guilty of any of the following offenses
established pursuant to Missouri law or offenses of a similar nature established under the laws
of Missouri prior to January 1, 2017, any other state or of the United States, or any other
country, whether or not the sentence is imposed:
(1) Any dangerous felony as defined in section 556.061, or murder in the first degree
under section 565.020;
(2) Any of the following sexual offenses: rape in the first degree under section
566.030; forcible rape; rape; statutory rape in the first degree under section 566.032; statutory
rape in the second degree under section 566.034; rape in the second degree under section
566.031; sexual assault under section 566.040 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013; sodomy
in the first degree under section 566.060; forcible sodomy under section 566.060 as it existed
prior to August 28, 2013; sodomy as it existed prior to January 1, 1995; statutory sodomy in
the first degree under section 566.062; statutory sodomy in the second degree under section
566.064; child molestation in the first degree; child molestation in the second degree; child
molestation in the third degree under section 566.069; child molestation in the fourth degree
under section 566.071; sodomy in the second degree under section 566.061; deviate sexual
assault under section 566.070 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013; sexual misconduct
involving a child under section 566.083; sexual contact with a student under section 566.086;
sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.093; sexual misconduct in the first
degree under section 566.090 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013; sexual misconduct in the
second degree under section 566.095; sexual misconduct in the second degree under section
566.093 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013; sexual misconduct in the third degree under
section 566.095 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013; sexual abuse in the first degree under
section 566.100; sexual abuse under section 566.100 as it existed prior to August 28, 2013;
sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101; enticement of a child under section
566.151; or attempting to entice a child;
(3) Any of the following offenses against the family and related offenses: incest
under section 568.020; abandonment of child in the first degree under section 568.030;
abandonment of child in the second degree under section 568.032; endangering the welfare of
a child in the first degree under section 568.045; abuse of a child under section 568.060; child
used in a sexual performance; promoting sexual performance by a child; or trafficking in
children under section 568.175; and

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 8
(4) Any of the following offenses involving child pornography as it existed prior to
August 28, 2026, or child sexual abuse material and related offenses: promoting obscenity
in the first degree under section 573.020; promoting pornography for minors or obscenity in
the second degree when the penalty is enhanced to a class E felony under section 573.030;
promoting child pornography in the first degree under section 573.025 as it existed prior to
August 28, 2026; promoting child sexual abuse material in the first degree under section
573.025; promoting child pornography in the second degree under section 573.035 as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026; promoting child sexual abuse material in the second
degree under section 573.035; possession of child pornography under section 573.037 as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026; possession of child sexual abuse material under section
573.037; furnishing pornographic materials to minors under section 573.040; or coercing
acceptance of obscene material under section 573.065.
7. When a certificate holder is found guilty of any offense that would authorize the
state board of education to seek discipline against that holder's certificate of license to teach,
the local board of education or the department of elementary and secondary education shall
immediately provide written notice to the state board of education and the attorney general
regarding the finding of guilt.
8. The certificate holder whose certificate was revoked pursuant to subsection 6 of
this section may appeal such revocation to the state board of education. Notice of this appeal
must be received by the commissioner of education within ninety days of notice of revocation
pursuant to this subsection. Failure of the certificate holder to notify the commissioner of the
intent to appeal waives all rights to appeal the revocation. Upon notice of the certificate
holder's intent to appeal, an appeal hearing shall be held by a hearing officer designated by the
commissioner of education, with the final decision made by the state board of education,
based upon the record of that hearing. The certificate holder shall be given not less than thirty
days' notice of the hearing, and an opportunity to be heard by the hearing officer, together
with witnesses.
100 9. In the case of any certificate holder who has surrendered or failed to renew his or
101 her certificate of license to teach, the state board of education may refuse to issue or renew, or
102 may suspend or revoke, such certificate for any of the reasons contained in this section.
103 10. In those cases where the charges filed pursuant to this section are based upon an
104 allegation of misconduct involving a minor child, the hearing officer may accept into the
105 record the sworn testimony of the minor child relating to the misconduct received in any court
106 or administrative hearing.
107 11. Hearings, appeals or other matters involving certificate holders, licensees or
108 applicants pursuant to this section may be informally resolved by consent agreement or

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 9
109 agreed settlement or voluntary surrender of the certificate of license pursuant to the rules
110 promulgated by the state board of education.
111 12. The final decision of the state board of education is subject to judicial review
112 pursuant to sections 536.100 to 536.140.
113 13. A certificate of license to teach to an individual who has been convicted of a
114 felony or crime involving moral turpitude, whether or not sentence is imposed, shall be issued
115 only upon motion of the state board of education adopted by a unanimous affirmative vote of
116 those members present and voting.
190.142. 1. (1) For applications submitted before the recognition of EMS personnel
licensure interstate compact under sections 190.900 to 190.939 takes effect, the department
shall, within a reasonable time after receipt of an application, cause such investigation as it
deems necessary to be made of the applicant for an emergency medical technician's license.
(2) For applications submitted after the recognition of EMS personnel licensure
interstate compact under sections 190.900 to 190.939 takes effect, an applicant for initial
licensure as an emergency medical technician in this state shall submit to a background check
by the Missouri state highway patrol and the Federal Bureau of Investigation through a
process approved by the department of health and senior services. Such processes may
include the use of vendors or systems administered by the Missouri state highway patrol. The
department may share the results of such a criminal background check with any emergency
services licensing agency in any member state, as that term is defined under section 190.900,
in recognition of the EMS personnel licensure interstate compact. The department shall not
issue a license until the department receives the results of an applicant's criminal background
check from the Missouri state highway patrol and the Federal Bureau of Investigation, but,
notwithstanding this subsection, the department may issue a temporary license as provided
under section 190.143. Any fees due for a criminal background check shall be paid by the
applicant.
(3) The director may authorize investigations into criminal records in other states for
any applicant.
2. The department shall issue a license to all levels of emergency medical technicians,
for a period of five years, if the applicant meets the requirements established pursuant to
sections 190.001 to 190.245 and the rules adopted by the department pursuant to sections
190.001 to 190.245. The department may promulgate rules relating to the requirements for an
emergency medical technician including but not limited to:
(1) Age requirements;
(2) Emergency medical technician and paramedic education and training
requirements based on respective National Emergency Medical Services Education

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 10
Standards and any modification to such curricula specified by the department through rules
adopted pursuant to sections 190.001 to 190.245;
(3) Paramedic accreditation requirements. Paramedic training programs shall be
accredited as required by the National Registry of Emergency Medical Technicians;
(4) Initial licensure testing requirements. Initial paramedic licensure testing shall be
through the national registry of EMTs;
(5) [Continuing education and relicensure requirements]
(a) The department shall require each emergency medical technician, as defined
in section 190.100, advanced emergency medical technician, as defined in section
190.100, and paramedic, as defined in section 190.100, to complete a one-time four-hour
course of training on sex and human trafficking as a condition of relicensure;
(b) The training may be conducted online, shall be consistent with the guidelines
established in section 210.1505, and shall be available at no cost to the personnel
identified in this section and all ambulance services and fire departments. The training
may be counted toward elective topics as determined by the department, provided that
the content is approved by the department as established by regulation;
(c) This requirement shall apply to any relicensure with an effective date after
March 31, 2027. The department shall promulgate any rules necessary to implement
and document compliance with this requirement;
(d) This provision shall expire December 31, 2032; and
(6) Ability to speak, read and write the English language.
3. Application for all levels of emergency medical technician license shall be made
upon such forms as prescribed by the department in rules adopted pursuant to sections
190.001 to 190.245. The application form shall contain such information as the department
deems necessary to make a determination as to whether the emergency medical technician
meets all the requirements of sections 190.001 to 190.245 and rules promulgated pursuant to
sections 190.001 to 190.245.
4. All levels of emergency medical technicians may perform only that patient care
which is:
(1) Consistent with the training, education and experience of the particular emergency
medical technician; and
(2) Ordered by a physician or set forth in protocols approved by the medical director.
5. No person shall hold themselves out as an emergency medical technician or
provide the services of an emergency medical technician unless such person is licensed by the
department.
6. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 11
with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2002, shall be invalid
and void.
210.1080. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Child care provider", a person licensed, regulated, or registered to provide child
care within the state of Missouri, including the member or members, manager or managers,
shareholder or shareholders, director or directors, and officer or officers of any entity
licensed, regulated, or registered to provide child care within the state of Missouri;
(2) "Child care staff member", a child care provider; persons employed by the child
care provider for compensation, including contract employees or self-employed individuals;
individuals or volunteers whose activities involve the care or supervision of children for a
child care provider or unsupervised access to children who are cared for or supervised by a
child care provider; individuals residing in a home where child care is provided who are
eighteen years of age or older; or individuals residing in a home where child care is provided
who are under eighteen years of age and have been certified as an adult for the commission of
an offense;
(3) "Criminal background check":
(a) A Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint check;
(b) A search of the National Crime Information Center's National Sex Offender
Registry; and
(c) A search of the following registries, repositories, or databases in Missouri, the
state where the child care staff member resides, and each state where such staff member
resided during the preceding five years:
a. The state criminal registry or repository, with the use of fingerprints being required
in the state where the staff member resides and optional in other states;
b. The state sex offender registry or repository; and
c. The state-based child abuse and neglect registry and database;
(4) "Department", the department of elementary and secondary education;
(5) "Qualifying result" or "qualifying criminal background check", a finding that a
child care staff member or prospective child care staff member is eligible for employment or
presence in a child care setting described under this section.
2. (1) Prior to the employment or presence of a child care staff member in a licensed,
license-exempt, or unlicensed registered child care facility, the child care provider shall

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 12
request the results of a criminal background check for such child care staff member from the
department.
(2) A prospective child care staff member may begin work for a child care provider
after receiving the qualifying result of either a Federal Bureau of Investigation fingerprint
check or a search of the Missouri criminal registry or repository with the use of fingerprints;
however, pending completion of the criminal background check, the prospective child care
staff member shall be supervised at all times by another child care staff member who received
a qualifying result on the criminal background check within the past five years.
(3) Any individual who meets the definition of child care provider but is not
responsible for the oversight or direction of the child care facility and does not have
independent access to the child care facility shall not be required to request the results of a
criminal background check under this section; however, such individual shall be accompanied
by an individual with a qualifying criminal background check in order to be present at the
child care facility during child care hours.
3. The costs of the criminal background check shall be the responsibility of the child
care staff member, but may be paid or reimbursed by the child care provider at the provider's
discretion. The fees charged for the criminal background check shall not exceed the actual
cost of processing and administration.
4. Upon completion of the criminal background check, any child care staff member or
prospective child care staff member shall be ineligible for employment or presence at a
licensed or license-exempt child care facility or an unlicensed child care facility registered
with the department and shall be disqualified from receipt of state or federal funds for
providing child care services either by direct payment or through reimbursement to an
individual who receives child care benefits if such person:
(1) Refuses to consent to the criminal background check as required by this section;
(2) Knowingly makes a materially false statement in connection with the criminal
background check as required by this section;
(3) Is registered, or is required to be registered, on a state sex offender registry or
repository or the National Sex Offender Registry;
(4) Is listed as a perpetrator of child abuse or neglect under sections 210.109 to
210.183 or any other finding of child abuse or neglect based on any other state's registry or
database; or
(5) Has pled guilty or nolo contendere to or been found guilty of:
(a) Any felony for an offense against the person as defined in chapter 565;
(b) Any other offense against the person involving the endangerment of a child as
prescribed by law;
(c) Any misdemeanor or felony for a sexual offense as defined in chapter 566;

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 13
(d) Any misdemeanor or felony for an offense against the family as defined in chapter
568;
(e) Burglary in the first degree as defined in 569.160;
(f) Any misdemeanor or felony for robbery as defined in chapter 570;
(g) Any misdemeanor or felony for pornography or related offense as defined in
chapter 573;
(h) Any felony for arson as defined in chapter 569;
(i) Any felony for armed criminal action as defined in section 571.015, unlawful use
of a weapon as defined in section 571.030, unlawful possession of a firearm as defined in
section 571.070, or the unlawful possession of an explosive as defined in section 571.072;
(j) Any felony for making a terrorist threat as defined in section 574.115, 574.120, or
574.125;
(k) A felony drug-related offense committed during the preceding five years; or
(l) Any similar offense in any federal, state, municipal, or other court of similar
jurisdiction of which the department has knowledge.
5. Household members eighteen years of age or older, or household members under
eighteen years of age who have been certified as an adult for the commission of an offense,
shall be ineligible to maintain a presence at a home where child care is provided during child
care hours if any one or more of the provisions of subsection 4 of this section apply to such
members.
6. A child care provider may also be disqualified from receipt of state or federal funds
for providing child care services either by direct payment or through reimbursement to an
individual who receives child care benefits if such person, or any person eighteen years of age
or older residing in the household in which child care is being provided, excluding child care
provided in the child's home, has been refused licensure or has experienced licensure
suspension or revocation under section 210.221 or 210.496.
7. A child care provider shall not be required to submit a request for a criminal
background check under this section for a child care staff member if:
(1) The staff member received a qualifying criminal background check within five
years before the latest date on which such a submission may be made and while employed by
or seeking employment by another child care provider within Missouri;
(2) The departments of elementary and secondary education, health and senior
100 services, or [of] social services provided to the first provider a qualifying criminal
101 background check result, consistent with this section, for the staff member; and
102 (3) The staff member is employed by a child care provider within Missouri or has
103 been separated from employment from a child care provider within Missouri for a period of
104 not more than one hundred eighty consecutive days.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 14
105 8. (1) The department shall process the request for a criminal background check for
106 any prospective child care staff member or child care staff member as expeditiously as
107 possible, but not to exceed forty-five days after the date on which the provider submitted the
108 request.
109 (2) The department shall provide the results of the criminal background check to the
110 child care provider in a statement that indicates whether the prospective child care staff
111 member or child care staff member is eligible or ineligible for employment or presence at the
112 child care facility or receipt of state or federal funds for providing child care services either by
113 direct payment or through reimbursement to an individual who receives child care benefits.
114 The department shall not reveal to the child care provider any disqualifying crime or other
115 related information regarding the prospective child care staff member or child care staff
116 member.
117 (3) If such prospective child care staff member or child care staff member is ineligible
118 for employment or presence at the child care facility, the department shall, when providing
119 the results of criminal background check, include information related to each disqualifying
120 crime or other related information, in a report to such prospective child care staff member or
121 child care staff member, along with information regarding the opportunity to appeal under
122 subsection 9 of this section.
123 (4) If a prospective child care provider or child care provider has been denied state or
124 federal funds by the department for providing child care, he or she may appeal such denial to
125 the department pursuant to section 210.027.
126 9. (1) The prospective child care staff member or child care staff member may appeal
127 a finding of ineligibility for employment or presence at a child care facility in writing to the
128 department to challenge the accuracy or completeness of the information contained in his or
129 her criminal background check if his or her finding of ineligibility is based on one or more of
130 the following offenses:
131 (a) Murder, as described in 18 U.S.C. Section 1111;
132 (b) Felony child abuse or neglect;
133 (c) A felony crime against children, including child pornography as it existed prior
134 to August 28, 2026, or child sexual abuse material;
135 (d) Felony spousal abuse;
136 (e) A felony crime involving rape or sexual assault;
137 (f) Felony kidnapping;
138 (g) Felony arson;
139 (h) Felony physical assault or battery;
140 (i) A violent misdemeanor offense committed as an adult against a child, including
141 the offense of child abuse, child endangerment, or sexual assault, or a misdemeanor offense

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 15
142 involving child pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or child sexual abuse
143 material; or
144 (j) Any similar offense in any federal, state, municipal, or other court.
145 (2) If a finding of ineligibility is based on an offense not provided for in subdivision
146 (1) of this subsection, the prospective child care staff member or child care staff member may
147 appeal to challenge the accuracy or completeness of the information contained in his or her
148 criminal background check or to offer information mitigating the results and explaining why
149 an eligibility exception should be granted.
150 (3) The written appeal shall be filed with the department within ten days from the
151 mailing of the notice of ineligibility. The department shall attempt to verify the accuracy of
152 the information challenged by the individual, including making an effort to locate any missing
153 disposition information related to the disqualifying offense. After the department verifies the
154 accuracy of the information challenged by the individual, the department shall make a final
155 decision on the written appeal, and such decision shall be made in a timely manner. Such
156 decision shall be considered a noncontested final agency decision by the department,
157 appealable under section 536.150. Such decision shall be appealed within thirty days of the
158 mailing of the decision.
159 10. Nothing in this section shall prohibit the department from requiring more frequent
160 checks of the family care safety registry established under section 210.903 or the central
161 registry for child abuse established under section 210.109 in order to determine eligibility for
162 employment or presence at the child care facility or receipt of state or federal funds for
163 providing child care services either by direct payment or through reimbursement to an
164 individual who receives child care benefits.
165 11. The department may adopt emergency rules to implement the requirements of this
166 section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
167 created under the authority delegated in this section shall become effective only if it complies
168 with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028.
169 This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
170 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to
171 disapprove and annul a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
172 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2018, shall be invalid
173 and void.
174 12. The provisions of this section shall not apply to any child care facility, as defined
175 in section 210.201, maintained or operated under the exclusive control of a religious
176 organization, as described in subdivision (17) of subsection 1 of section 210.211, unless such
177 facility is a recipient of federal funds for providing care for children, except for federal funds

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 16
178 for those programs that meet the requirements for participation in the Child and Adult Care
179 Food Program under 42 U.S.C. Section 1766.
210.1505. 1. There is hereby created the "Statewide Council [on Sex] Against Adult
Trafficking and the Commercial Sexual Exploitation of Children" [to] within the office of
the attorney general to make recommendations for a coordinated statewide effort
against the trafficking of adults and children within the state of Missouri. The council
shall consist of the following members:
(1) The following four members of the general assembly:
(a) Two members of the senate, with one member to be appointed by the president pro
tempore of the senate and one member to be appointed by the minority floor leader of the
senate; and
(b) Two members of the house of representatives, with one member to be appointed
by the speaker of the house of representatives and one member to be appointed by the
minority floor leader of the house of representatives;
(2) The director of the children's division or his or her designee who is involved in
anti-human trafficking efforts or has knowledge or experience in human trafficking
investigations;
(3) The director of the department of public safety or his or her designee who is
involved in anti-human trafficking efforts or has knowledge or experience in human
trafficking investigations;
(4) The director of the department of mental health or his or her designee who is
involved in anti-human trafficking efforts or has knowledge or experience in human
trafficking investigations;
(5) The director of the office of prosecution services or his or her designee who is
involved in anti-human trafficking efforts or has knowledge or experience in human
trafficking investigations;
(6) The superintendent of the Missouri state highway patrol or his or her designee
who is involved in anti-human trafficking efforts or has knowledge or experience in
human trafficking investigations;
(7) The executive director of the statewide network of child advocacy organizations
[specializing in the prevention of child abuse or neglect] or his or her designee who is
involved in anti-human trafficking efforts or has knowledge or experience in human
trafficking investigations;
(8) The executive director of the statewide coalition against domestic and sexual
violence or his or her designee who is involved in anti-human trafficking efforts or has
knowledge or experience in human trafficking investigations;

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 17
(9) The executive director of the Missouri Juvenile Justice Association or his or her
designee who is involved in anti-human trafficking efforts or has knowledge or
experience in human trafficking investigations;
(10) The director of the attorney general's human trafficking task force or his or her
designee who is involved in anti-human trafficking efforts or has knowledge or
experience in human trafficking investigations;
(11) [Two representatives from agencies providing services to victims of child sex
trafficking and sexual exploitation who reflect the geographic diversity of the state and who
shall be appointed by the director of the department of social services; and] A member of the
Missouri Hospital Association with experience and knowledge of human trafficking;
(12) A member of the judiciary with experience in juvenile court, who shall be
appointed by the chief justice of the Missouri supreme court;
(13) The commissioner of the department of elementary and secondary
education or his or her designee;
(14) A designee from the governor's office;
(15) A member of the Missouri Sheriffs' Association or a member of the
Missouri Police Chiefs Association; and
(16) A representative of any other nongovernmental organization deemed
necessary by the attorney general.
2. A majority of the members of the council shall constitute a quorum. The council
shall be created within thirty days of August 28, 2026, and shall hold its first meeting
within thirty days after the council's creation [and organize by selecting a chair and a vice
chair]. The council shall meet at [the call of the chair] least quarterly. The council may
create a subgroup to offer recommendations on specific issues as deemed necessary.
3. [The council shall:
(1) Collect and analyze data relating to sex trafficking and sexual exploitation of
children, including the number of reports made to the children's division under section
210.115, any information obtained from phone calls to the national sex trafficking hotline, the
number of reports made to law enforcement, arrests, prosecution rates, and any other data
important for any recommendations of the council. State departments and council members
shall provide relevant data as requested by the council to fulfill the council's duties; and
(2) Collect feedback from stakeholders, practitioners, and leadership throughout the
state in order to develop best practices and procedures regarding the response to sex
trafficking and sexual exploitation of children, including identification and assessment of
victims; response and treatment coordination and collaboration across systems; trauma-
informed, culturally competent victim-centered services; training for professionals in all
systems; and investigating and prosecuting perpetrators.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 18
4.] There shall be an executive director, who shall be appointed by the attorney
general. The attorney general shall fix the executive director's compensation and
provide for such other administrative personnel as necessary within the limits of
appropriations provided in subsection 4 of this section. The executive director shall
serve under the supervision of the [department of social services] attorney general, who
shall provide administrative support [to the council] and necessary office space.
[5. On or before December 31, 2023, the council shall submit a report of the council's
activities to the governor and general assembly and the joint committee on child abuse and
neglect under section 21.771. The report shall include recommendations for priority needs
and actions, including statutory or regulatory changes relating to the response to sex
trafficking and sexual exploitation of children and services for child victims.
6. The council shall expire on December 31, 2023.]
4. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Commercial Sexual
Exploitation of Children Education and Awareness Fund", which shall consist of
moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly and any grants, gifts, donations, and
bequests. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer shall approve disbursements as required
by the attorney general. The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation,
moneys in this fund shall be used to pay for the position of the executive director and for
administrative support of the statewide council against adult trafficking and the
commercial exploitation of children, education and awareness regarding human
trafficking, and anti-trafficking efforts throughout the state of Missouri.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
100 5. There is hereby established the "Committee on Sex and Human Trafficking
101 Training" within the council.
102 6. The committee shall consist of the following members:
103 (1) A representative of the attorney general's office who is involved in the office's
104 anti-trafficking efforts appointed by the attorney general;
105 (2) A representative of the department of public safety with experience in human
106 trafficking investigations appointed by the director of the department of public safety;
107 (3) A representative from a child advocacy center appointed by the director of a
108 statewide nonprofit organization that advocates for the protection of children;

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 19
109 (4) A juvenile officer appointed by the chief justice of the supreme court of
110 Missouri;
111 (5) A representative from an agency providing victim services appointed by the
112 director of the department of social services;
113 (6) A representative from a child abuse medical resource center, as defined in
114 section 334.950, appointed by the director of the department of health and senior
115 services;
116 (7) The executive director of the Missouri office of prosecution services or his or
117 her designee; and
118 (8) A representative from a statewide organization of nurses or emergency
119 nurses.
120 7. The member who represents the attorney general's office shall serve as chair
121 of the committee.
122 8. Members of the committee shall serve without compensation but may be
123 reimbursed for actual expenses necessary to the performance of their official duties for
124 the committee.
125 9. The committee shall annually evaluate, and establish guidelines for, the sex
126 and human trafficking training required under sections 56.265, 190.142, 211.326,
127 337.618, and 590.050. The committee shall produce, and distribute in a digital platform,
128 training that meets its guidelines. The committee may approve training produced by
129 other entities as consistent with its guidelines.
130 10. Any board, department, or agency that regulates any profession for which
131 sex and human trafficking training is required as described in subsection 9 of this
132 section may provide such training. Funding for the training shall be subject to
133 appropriations.
134 11. The provisions of subsections 5 to 10 of this section shall become effective on
135 January 1, 2027, and shall expire on December 31, 2031.
211.326. 1. The state courts administrator shall:
(1) Evaluate existing services by establishing performance standards including
performance standards for juvenile courts receiving diversion funds;
(2) Develop standards for orientation training for all new juvenile court professional
personnel, including juvenile officers, deputy juvenile officers and other personnel deemed
necessary by the state courts administrator;
(3) Develop standards for continuing education for existing juvenile court
professional personnel, including juvenile officers, deputy juvenile officers and other
personnel deemed necessary by the state courts administrator;
(4) Develop a process to evaluate services and collect relevant outcome data;

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 20
(5) Develop a standardized assessment form for classifying juvenile offenders; and
(6) Develop guidelines for juvenile court judges to use in determining the length of
time a child may be detained prior to informal adjustment or formal adjudication.
2. Standards, training and assessment forms developed pursuant to subsection 1 of
this section shall be developed considering racial disparities in the juvenile justice system.
3. Continuing education standards established under subdivision (3) of
subsection 1 of this section shall include a requirement that each juvenile officer
annually complete one hour of sex and human trafficking training consistent with the
guidelines established in section 210.1505. The provisions of this subsection shall
become effective on January 1, 2027, and shall expire on December 31, 2031.
324.012. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Fresh Start Act of
2020".
2. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Criminal conviction", any conviction, finding of guilt, plea of guilty, or plea of
nolo contendere;
(2) "Licensing", any required training, education, or fee to work in a specific
occupation, profession, or activity in the state;
(3) "Licensing authority", an agency, examining board, credentialing board, or other
office of the state with the authority to impose occupational fees or licensing requirements on
any profession. For purposes of the provisions of this section other than subsection 7 of this
section, the term "licensing authority" shall not include the state board of education's
licensure of teachers pursuant to chapter 168, the Missouri state board of accountant's
licensure of accountants pursuant to chapter 326, the board of podiatric medicine's licensure
of podiatrists pursuant to chapter 330, the Missouri dental board's licensure of dentists
pursuant to chapter 332, the state board of registration for the healing art's licensure of
physicians and surgeons pursuant to chapter 334, the Missouri state board of nursing's
licensure of nurses pursuant to chapter 335, the board of pharmacy's licensure of pharmacists
pursuant to chapter 338, the Missouri real estate commission's licensure of real estate brokers,
real estate salespersons, or real estate broker-salespersons pursuant to sections 339.010 to
339.205, the Missouri veterinary medical board's licensure of veterinarian's pursuant to
chapter 340, the Missouri director of finance appointed pursuant to chapter 361, or the peace
officer standards and training commission's licensure of peace officers or other law
enforcement personnel pursuant to chapter 590;
(4) "Political subdivision", a city, town, village, municipality, or county.
3. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, beginning January 1, 2021, no person
shall be disqualified by a state licensing authority from pursuing, practicing, or engaging in
any occupation for which a license is required solely or in part because of a prior conviction

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 21
of a crime in this state or another state, unless the criminal conviction directly relates to the
duties and responsibilities for the licensed occupation as set forth in this section or is violent
or sexual in nature.
4. Beginning August 28, 2020, applicants for examination of licensure who have
pleaded guilty to, entered a plea of nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any of the
following offenses or offenses of a similar nature established under the laws of this state, any
other state, United States, or any other country, notwithstanding whether sentence is imposed,
shall be considered by state licensing authorities to have committed a criminal offense that
directly relates to the duties and responsibilities of a licensed profession:
(1) Any murder in the first degree, or dangerous felony as defined under section
556.061 excluding an intoxication-related traffic offense or intoxication-related boating
offense if the person is found to be a habitual offender or habitual boating offender as such
terms are defined in section 577.001;
(2) Any of the following sexual offenses: rape in the first degree, forcible rape, rape,
statutory rape in the first degree, statutory rape in the second degree, rape in the second
degree, sexual assault, sodomy in the first degree, forcible sodomy, statutory sodomy in the
first degree, statutory sodomy in the second degree, child molestation in the first degree, child
molestation in the second degree, sodomy in the second degree, deviate sexual assault, sexual
misconduct involving a child, sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.090 as
it existed prior to August 28, 2013, sexual abuse under section 566.100 as it existed prior to
August 28, 2013, sexual abuse in the first or second degree, enticement of a child, or
attempting to entice a child;
(3) Any of the following offenses against the family and related offenses: incest,
abandonment of a child in the first degree, abandonment of a child in the second degree,
endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree, abuse of a child, using a child in a
sexual performance, promoting sexual performance by a child, or trafficking in children; and
(4) Any of the following offenses involving child pornography as it existed prior to
August 28, 2026, or child sexual abuse material and related offenses: promoting obscenity
in the first degree, promoting obscenity in the second degree when the penalty is enhanced to
a class E felony, promoting child pornography in the first degree as it existed prior to
August 28, 2026, promoting child sexual abuse material in the first degree, promoting
child pornography in the second degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, promoting
child sexual abuse material in the second degree, possession of child pornography in the
first degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, possession of child sexual abuse
material in the first degree, possession of child pornography in the second degree as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026, possession of child sexual abuse material in the second
degree, furnishing child pornography to a minor as it existed prior to August 28, 2026,

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 22
furnishing child sexual abuse material to a minor, furnishing pornographic materials to
minors, or coercing acceptance of obscene material;
(5) The offense of delivery of a controlled substance, as provided in section 579.020,
may be a disqualifying criminal offense for the following occupations: real estate appraisers
and appraisal management companies, licensed pursuant to sections 339.500 to 339.549; and
nursing home administrators, licensed pursuant to chapter 344; and
(6) Any offense an essential element of which is fraud may be a disqualifying
criminal offense for the following occupations: private investigators, licensed pursuant to
sections 324.1100 to 324.1148; accountants, licensed pursuant to chapter 326; architects,
licensed pursuant to sections 327.091 to 327.172; engineers, licensed pursuant to sections
327.181 to 327.271; land surveyors, licensed pursuant to sections 327.272 to 327.371;
landscape architects, licensed pursuant to sections 327.600 to 327.635; chiropractors, licensed
pursuant to chapter 331; embalmers and funeral directors, licensed pursuant to chapter 333;
real estate appraisers and appraisal management companies, licensed pursuant to sections
339.500 to 339.549; and nursing home administrators, licensed pursuant to chapter 344.
5. If an individual is charged with any of the crimes set forth in subsection 4 of this
section, and is convicted, pleads guilty to, or is found guilty of a lesser-included offense and
is sentenced to a period of incarceration, such conviction shall only be considered by state
licensing authorities as a criminal offense that directly relates to the duties and responsibilities
of a licensed profession for four years, beginning on the date such individual is released from
incarceration.
6. (1) The licensing authority shall determine whether an applicant with a criminal
conviction will be denied a license based on the following factors:
(a) The nature and seriousness of the crime for which the individual was convicted;
(b) The passage of time since the commission of the crime, including consideration of
the factors listed under subdivision (2) of this subsection;
(c) The relationship of the crime to the ability, capacity, and fitness required to
perform the duties and discharge the responsibilities of the occupation; and
(d) Any evidence of rehabilitation or treatment undertaken by the individual that
might mitigate against a direct relation.
(2) If an individual has a valid criminal conviction for a criminal offense that could
disqualify the individual from receiving a license, the disqualification shall not apply to an
individual who has been exonerated for a crime for which he or she has previously been
convicted of or incarcerated.
7. An individual with a criminal record may petition a licensing authority at any time
100 for a determination of whether the individual's criminal record will disqualify the individual
101 from obtaining a license. This petition shall include details on the individual's criminal

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 23
102 record. The licensing authority shall inform the individual of his or her standing within thirty
103 days after the licensing authority has met, but in no event more than four months after
104 receiving the petition from the applicant. The decision shall be binding, unless the individual
105 has subsequent criminal convictions or failed to disclose information in his or her petition. If
106 the decision is that the individual is disqualified, the individual shall be notified in writing of
107 the grounds and reasons for disqualification. The licensing authority may charge a fee by rule
108 to recoup its costs as set by rulemaking authority not to exceed twenty-five dollars for each
109 petition.
110 8. (1) If a licensing authority denies an individual a license solely or in part because
111 of the individual's prior conviction of a crime, the licensing authority shall notify the
112 individual in writing of the following:
113 (a) The grounds and reasons for the denial or disqualification;
114 (b) That the individual has the right to a hearing as provided by chapter 621 to
115 challenge the licensing authority's decision;
116 (c) The earliest date the person may reapply for a license; and
117 (d) That evidence of rehabilitation may be considered upon reapplication.
118 (2) Any written determination by the licensing authority that an applicant's criminal
119 conviction is a specifically listed disqualifying conviction and is directly related to the duties
120 and responsibilities for the licensed occupation shall be documented with written findings for
121 each of the grounds or reasons under paragraph (a) of subdivision (1) of this subsection by
122 clear and convincing evidence sufficient for a reviewing court.
123 (3) In any administrative hearing or civil litigation authorized under this subsection,
124 the licensing authority shall carry the burden of proof on the question of whether the
125 applicant's criminal conviction directly relates to the occupation for which the license is
126 sought.
127 9. The provisions of this section shall apply to any profession for which an
128 occupational license is issued in this state, including any new occupational license created by
129 a state licensing authority after August 28, 2020. Notwithstanding any other provision of law,
130 political subdivisions shall be prohibited from creating any new occupational licenses after
131 August 28, 2020. The provisions of this section shall not apply to business licenses, where
132 the terms "occupational licenses" and "business licenses" are used interchangeably in a city or
133 county charter definition.
324.035. 1. No board, commission, or committee within the division of professional
registration shall utilize occupational fees, or any other fees associated with licensing
requirements, or contract or partner with any outside vendor or agency for the purpose of
offering continuing education classes unless the continuing education program is

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 24
approved by the director of the division of professional registration and is available to
all licensees of the board, commission, or committee.
2. Nothing in this section shall be construed to preclude a board, commission, or
committee within the division of professional registration from utilizing occupational
licensure fees for the purpose of participating in conferences, seminars, or other outreach for
the purpose of communicating information to licensees with respect to changes in policy, law,
or regulations.
329.050. 1. Applicants for examination or licensure pursuant to this chapter shall
possess the following qualifications:
(1) They shall provide documentation of successful completion of courses approved
by the board, have an education equivalent to the successful completion of the tenth grade,
and be at least seventeen years of age;
(2) If the applicants are apprentices, they shall have served and completed, as an
apprentice under the supervision of a licensed cosmetologist, the time and studies required by
the board which shall be no less than three thousand hours for cosmetologists, and no less
than eight hundred hours for manicurists and no less than fifteen hundred hours for esthetics.
However, when the classified occupation of manicurist is apprenticed in conjunction with the
classified occupation of cosmetologist, the apprentice shall be required to successfully
complete an apprenticeship of no less than a total of three thousand hours;
(3) If the applicants are students, they shall have had the required time in a licensed
school of no less than one thousand five hundred hours training or the credit hours determined
by the formula in Subpart A of Part 668 of Section 668.8 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal
Regulations, as amended, for the classification of cosmetologist, with the exception of public
vocational technical schools in which a student shall complete no less than one thousand two
hundred twenty hours training. All students shall complete no less than four hundred hours or
the credit hours determined by the formula in Subpart A of Part 668 of Section 668.8 of Title
34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended, for the classification of manicurist. All
students shall complete no less than seven hundred fifty hours or the credit hours determined
by the formula in Subpart A of Part 668 of Section 668.8 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal
Regulations, as amended, for the classification of esthetician. However, when the classified
occupation of manicurist is taken in conjunction with the classified occupation of
cosmetologist, the student shall not be required to serve the extra four hundred hours or
the credit hours determined by the formula in Subpart A of Part 668 of Section 668.8 of Title
34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended, otherwise required to include manicuring
of nails; and
(4) They shall have passed an examination to the satisfaction of the board.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 25
2. A person may apply to take the examination required by subsection 1 of this
section if the person is a graduate of a school of cosmetology or apprentice program in
another state or territory of the United States which has substantially the same requirements
as an educational establishment licensed pursuant to this chapter. A person may apply to take
the examination required by subsection 1 of this section if the person is a graduate of an
educational establishment in a foreign country that provides training for a classified
occupation of cosmetology, as defined by section 329.010, and has educational requirements
that are substantially the same requirements as an educational establishment licensed under
this chapter. The board has sole discretion to determine the substantial equivalency of such
educational requirements. The board may require that transcripts from foreign schools be
submitted for its review, and the board may require that the applicant provide an approved
English translation of such transcripts.
3. Each application shall contain a statement that, subject to the penalties of making a
false affidavit or declaration, the application is made under oath or affirmation and that its
representations are true and correct to the best knowledge and belief of the person signing the
application.
4. The sufficiency of the qualifications of applicants shall be determined by the board,
but the board may delegate this authority to its executive director subject to such provisions as
the board may adopt.
5. Applications for examination or licensure may be denied if the applicant has
pleaded guilty to, entered a plea of nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any of the
following offenses or offenses of a similar nature established under the laws of this state, any
other state, the United States, or any other country, notwithstanding whether sentence is
imposed:
(1) Any dangerous felony as defined under section 556.061 or murder in the first
degree;
(2) Any of the following sexual offenses: rape in the first degree, forcible rape, rape,
statutory rape in the first degree, statutory rape in the second degree, rape in the second
degree, sexual assault, sodomy in the first degree, forcible sodomy, statutory sodomy in the
first degree, statutory sodomy in the second degree, child molestation in the first degree, child
molestation in the second degree, sodomy in the second degree, deviate sexual assault, sexual
misconduct involving a child, sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.090 as
it existed prior to August 28, 2013, sexual abuse under section 566.100 as it existed prior to
August 28, 2013, sexual abuse in the first or second degree, enticement of a child, or
attempting to entice a child;
(3) Any of the following offenses against the family and related offenses: incest,
abandonment of a child in the first degree, abandonment of a child in the second degree,

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 26
endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree, abuse of a child, using a child in a
sexual performance, promoting sexual performance by a child, or trafficking in children; and
(4) Any of the following offenses involving child pornography as it existed prior to
August 28, 2026, or child sexual abuse material and related offenses: promoting obscenity
in the first degree, promoting obscenity in the second degree when the penalty is enhanced to
a class E felony, promoting child pornography in the first degree as it existed prior to
August 28, 2026, promoting child sexual abuse material in the first degree, promoting
child pornography in the second degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, promoting
child sexual abuse material in the second degree, possession of child pornography in the
first degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, possession of child sexual abuse
material in the first degree, possession of child pornography in the second degree as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026, possession of child sexual abuse material in the second
degree, furnishing child pornography to a minor as it existed prior to August 28, 2026,
furnishing child sexual abuse material to a minor, furnishing pornographic materials to
minors, or coercing acceptance of obscene material.
337.618. 1. Each license issued pursuant to the provisions of sections 337.600 to
337.689 shall expire on a renewal date established by the director. The term of licensure shall
be twenty-four months. The committee shall require a minimum number of thirty clock hours
of continuing education for renewal of a license issued pursuant to sections 337.600 to
337.689, including two hours of suicide assessment, referral, treatment, and management
training. The committee shall renew any license upon application for a renewal, completion
of the required continuing education hours and upon payment of the fee established by the
committee pursuant to the provisions of section 337.612. As provided by rule, the board may
waive or extend the time requirements for completion of continuing education for reasons
related to health, military service, foreign residency, or for other good cause. All requests for
waivers or extensions of time shall be made in writing and submitted to the board before the
renewal date.
2. The hours of continuing education required for renewal of a license under this
section shall include two hours of sex and human trafficking training for the first
renewal cycle after initial licensure and one hour of sex and human trafficking training
for each licensure renewal thereafter consistent with the guidelines established in section
210.1505. The provisions of this subsection shall become effective on January 1, 2027,
and shall expire on December 31, 2031.
339.100. 1. The commission may, upon its own motion, and shall upon receipt of a
written complaint filed by any person, investigate any real estate-related activity of a licensee
licensed under sections 339.010 to 339.180 and sections 339.710 to 339.860 or an individual
or entity acting as or representing themselves as a real estate licensee. In conducting such

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 27
investigation, if the questioned activity or written complaint involves an affiliated licensee,
the commission may forward a copy of the information received to the affiliated licensee's
designated broker. The commission shall have the power to hold an investigatory hearing to
determine whether there is a probability of a violation of sections 339.010 to 339.180 and
sections 339.710 to 339.860. The commission shall have the power to issue a subpoena to
compel the production of records and papers bearing on the complaint. The commission shall
have the power to issue a subpoena and to compel any person in this state to come before the
commission to offer testimony or any material specified in the subpoena. Subpoenas and
subpoenas duces tecum issued pursuant to this section shall be served in the same manner as
subpoenas in a criminal case. The fees and mileage of witnesses shall be the same as that
allowed in the circuit court in civil cases.
2. The commission may cause a complaint to be filed with the administrative hearing
commission as provided by the provisions of chapter 621 against any person or entity licensed
under this chapter or any licensee who has failed to renew or has surrendered his or her
individual or entity license for any one or any combination of the following acts:
(1) Failure to maintain and deposit in a special account, separate and apart from his or
her personal or other business accounts, all moneys belonging to others entrusted to him or
her while acting as a real estate broker or as the temporary custodian of the funds of others,
until the transaction involved is consummated or terminated, unless all parties having an
interest in the funds have agreed otherwise in writing;
(2) Making substantial misrepresentations or false promises or suppression,
concealment or omission of material facts in the conduct of his or her business or pursuing
a flagrant and continued course of misrepresentation through agents, salespersons, advertising
or otherwise in any transaction;
(3) Failing within a reasonable time to account for or to remit any moneys, valuable
documents or other property, coming into his or her possession, which belongs to others;
(4) Representing to any lender, guaranteeing agency, or any other interested party,
either verbally or through the preparation of false documents, an amount in excess of the true
and actual sale price of the real estate or terms differing from those actually agreed upon;
(5) Failure to timely deliver a duplicate original of any and all instruments to any
party or parties executing the same where the instruments have been prepared by the licensee
or under his or her supervision or are within his or her control, including, but not limited to,
the instruments relating to the employment of the licensee or to any matter pertaining to the
consummation of a lease, listing agreement or the purchase, sale, exchange or lease of
property, or any type of real estate transaction in which he or she may participate as a
licensee;

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 28
(6) Acting for more than one party in a transaction without the knowledge of all
parties for whom he or she acts, or accepting a commission or valuable consideration for
services from more than one party in a real estate transaction without the knowledge of all
parties to the transaction;
(7) Paying a commission or valuable consideration to any person for acts or services
performed in violation of sections 339.010 to 339.180 and sections 339.710 to 339.860;
(8) Guaranteeing or having authorized or permitted any licensee to guarantee future
profits which may result from the resale of real property;
(9) Having been finally adjudicated and been found guilty of the violation of any state
or federal statute which governs the sale or rental of real property or the conduct of the real
estate business as defined in subsection 1 of section 339.010;
(10) Obtaining a certificate or registration of authority, permit or license for himself
or herself or anyone else by false or fraudulent representation, fraud or deceit;
(11) Representing a real estate broker other than the broker with whom associated
without the express written consent of the broker with whom associated;
(12) Accepting a commission or valuable consideration for the performance of any of
the acts referred to in section 339.010 from any person except the broker with whom
associated at the time the commission or valuable consideration was earned;
(13) Using prizes, money, gifts or other valuable consideration as inducement to
secure customers or clients to purchase, lease, sell or list property when the awarding of such
prizes, money, gifts or other valuable consideration is conditioned upon the purchase, lease,
sale or listing; or soliciting, selling or offering for sale real property by offering free lots, or
conducting lotteries or contests, or offering prizes for the purpose of influencing a purchaser
or prospective purchaser of real property;
(14) Placing a sign on or advertising any property offering it for sale or rent without
the written consent of the owner or his or her duly authorized agent;
(15) Violation of, or attempting to violate, directly or indirectly, or assisting or
enabling any person to violate, any provision of sections 339.010 to 339.180 and sections
339.710 to 339.860, or of any lawful rule adopted pursuant to sections 339.010 to 339.180
and sections 339.710 to 339.860;
(16) Committing any act which would otherwise be grounds for the commission to
refuse to issue a license under section 339.040;
(17) Failure to timely inform seller of all written offers unless otherwise instructed in
writing by the seller;
(18) Been finally adjudicated and found guilty, or entered a plea of guilty or nolo
contendere, in a criminal prosecution under the laws of this state or any other state or of the
United States, for any offense reasonably related to the qualifications, functions or duties of

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 29
any profession licensed or regulated under this chapter, or for any offense an essential
element of which is fraud, dishonesty or an act of violence, whether or not sentence is
imposed;
(19) Any other conduct which constitutes untrustworthy, improper or fraudulent
business dealings, demonstrates bad faith or incompetence, misconduct, or gross negligence;
(20) Disciplinary action against the holder of a license or other right to practice any
profession regulated under sections 339.010 to 339.180 and sections 339.710 to 339.860
granted by another state, territory, federal agency, or country upon grounds for which
revocation, suspension, or probation is authorized in this state;
(21) Been found by a court of competent jurisdiction of having used any controlled
substance, as defined in chapter 195, to the extent that such use impairs a person's ability to
perform the work of any profession licensed or regulated by sections 339.010 to 339.180 and
sections 339.710 to 339.860;
(22) Been finally adjudged insane or incompetent by a court of competent
jurisdiction;
(23) Assisting or enabling any person to practice or offer to practice any profession
licensed or regulated under sections 339.010 to 339.180 and sections 339.710 to 339.860 who
is not registered and currently eligible to practice under sections 339.010 to 339.180 and
sections 339.710 to 339.860;
(24) Use of any advertisement or solicitation which:
(a) Is knowingly false, misleading or deceptive to the general public or persons to
whom the advertisement or solicitation is primarily directed; or
100 (b) Includes a name or team name that uses the terms "realty", "brokerage",
101 "company", or any other terms that can be construed to advertise a real estate company other
102 than the licensee or a business entity licensed under this chapter with whom the licensee is
103 associated. The context of the advertisement or solicitation may be considered by the
104 commission when determining whether a licensee has committed a violation of this
105 paragraph;
106 (25) Making any material misstatement, misrepresentation, or omission with regard
107 to any application for licensure or license renewal. As used in this section, "material" means
108 important information about which the commission should be informed and which may
109 influence a licensing decision;
110 (26) Engaging in, committing, or assisting any person in engaging in or committing
111 mortgage fraud, as defined in section 443.930.
112 3. After the filing of such complaint, the proceedings will be conducted in accordance
113 with the provisions of law relating to the administrative hearing commission. A finding of the
114 administrative hearing commissioner that the licensee has performed or attempted to perform

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 30
115 one or more of the foregoing acts shall be grounds for the suspension or revocation of his
116 license by the commission, or the placing of the licensee on probation on such terms and
117 conditions as the real estate commission shall deem appropriate, or the imposition of a civil
118 penalty by the commission not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars for each offense.
119 Each day of a continued violation shall constitute a separate offense.
120 4. The commission may prepare a digest of the decisions of the administrative
121 hearing commission which concern complaints against licensed brokers or salespersons and
122 cause such digests to be mailed to all licensees periodically. Such digests may also contain
123 reports as to new or changed rules adopted by the commission and other information of
124 significance to licensees.
125 5. Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, a broker or salesperson's license
126 shall be revoked, or in the case of an applicant, shall not be issued, if the licensee or applicant
127 has pleaded guilty to, entered a plea of nolo contendere to, or been found guilty of any of the
128 following offenses or offenses of a similar nature established under the laws of this, any other
129 state, the United States, or any other country, notwithstanding whether sentence is imposed:
130 (1) Any dangerous felony as defined under section 556.061 or murder in the first
131 degree;
132 (2) Any of the following sexual offenses: rape in the first degree, forcible rape, rape,
133 statutory rape in the first degree, statutory rape in the second degree, rape in the second
134 degree, sexual assault, sodomy in the first degree, forcible sodomy, statutory sodomy in the
135 first degree, statutory sodomy in the second degree, child molestation in the first degree, child
136 molestation in the second degree, sodomy in the second degree, deviate sexual assault, sexual
137 misconduct involving a child, sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.090 as
138 it existed prior to August 28, 2013, sexual abuse under section 566.100 as it existed prior to
139 August 28, 2013, sexual abuse in the first or second degree, enticement of a child, or
140 attempting to entice a child;
141 (3) Any of the following offenses against the family and related offenses: incest,
142 abandonment of a child in the first degree, abandonment of a child in the second degree,
143 endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree, abuse of a child, using a child in a
144 sexual performance, promoting sexual performance by a child, or trafficking in children;
145 (4) Any of the following offenses involving child pornography as it existed prior to
146 August 28, 2026, or child sexual abuse material and related offenses: promoting obscenity
147 in the first degree, promoting obscenity in the second degree when the penalty is enhanced to
148 a class E felony, promoting child pornography in the first degree as it existed prior to
149 August 28, 2026, promoting child sexual abuse material in the first degree, promoting
150 child pornography in the second degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, promoting
151 child sexual abuse material in the second degree, possession of child pornography in the

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 31
152 first degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, possession of child sexual abuse
153 material in the first degree, possession of child pornography in the second degree as it
154 existed prior to August 28, 2026, possession of child sexual abuse material in the second
155 degree, furnishing child pornography to a minor as it existed prior to August 28, 2026,
156 furnishing child sexual abuse material to a minor, furnishing pornographic materials to
157 minors, or coercing acceptance of obscene material; and
158 (5) Mortgage fraud as defined in section 570.310.
159 6. A person whose license was revoked under subsection 5 of this section may appeal
160 such revocation to the administrative hearing commission. Notice of such appeal must be
161 received by the administrative hearing commission within ninety days of mailing, by certified
162 mail, the notice of revocation. Failure of a person whose license was revoked to notify the
163 administrative hearing commission of his or her intent to appeal waives all rights to appeal the
164 revocation. Upon notice of such person's intent to appeal, a hearing shall be held before the
165 administrative hearing commission.
455.050. 1. Any full or ex parte order of protection granted pursuant to sections
455.010 to 455.085 shall be to protect the petitioner from cyberstalking, domestic violence,
stalking, or sexual assault and may include such terms as the court reasonably deems
necessary to ensure the petitioner's safety, including but not limited to:
(1) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from committing or threatening to commit
cyberstalking, domestic violence, molesting, stalking, sexual assault, or disturbing the peace
of the petitioner, including violence against a pet;
(2) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from entering the premises of the dwelling
unit of the petitioner when the dwelling unit is:
(a) Jointly owned, leased or rented or jointly occupied by both parties; or
(b) Owned, leased, rented or occupied by petitioner individually; or
(c) Jointly owned, leased, rented or occupied by petitioner and a person other than
respondent; provided, however, no spouse shall be denied relief pursuant to this section by
reason of the absence of a property interest in the dwelling unit; or
(d) Jointly occupied by the petitioner and a person other than respondent; provided
that the respondent has no property interest in the dwelling unit; or
(3) Temporarily enjoining the respondent from communicating with the petitioner in
any manner or through any medium.
2. Mutual orders of protection are prohibited unless both parties have properly filed
written petitions and proper service has been made in accordance with sections 455.010 to
455.085.
3. When the court has, after a hearing for any full order of protection, issued an order
of protection, it may, in addition:

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 32
(1) Award custody of any minor child born to or adopted by the parties when the court
has jurisdiction over such child and no prior order regarding custody is pending or has been
made, and the best interests of the child require such order be issued;
(2) Establish a visitation schedule that is in the best interests of the child;
(3) Award child support in accordance with supreme court rule 88.01 and chapter
452;
(4) Award maintenance to petitioner when petitioner and respondent are lawfully
married in accordance with chapter 452;
(5) Order respondent to make or to continue to make rent or mortgage payments on a
residence occupied by the petitioner if the respondent is found to have a duty to support the
petitioner or other dependent household members;
(6) Order the respondent to pay the petitioner's rent at a residence other than the one
previously shared by the parties if the respondent is found to have a duty to support the
petitioner and the petitioner requests alternative housing;
(7) Order that the petitioner be given temporary possession of specified personal
property, such as automobiles, checkbooks, keys, and other personal effects;
(8) Prohibit the respondent from transferring, encumbering, or otherwise disposing of
specified property mutually owned or leased by the parties;
(9) Order the respondent to participate in a court-approved counseling program
designed to help batterers stop violent behavior or to participate in a substance abuse
treatment program;
(10) Order the respondent to pay a reasonable fee for housing and other services that
have been provided or that are being provided to the petitioner by a shelter for victims of
domestic violence;
(11) Order the respondent to pay court costs;
(12) Order the respondent to pay the cost of medical treatment and services that have
been provided or that are being provided to the petitioner as a result of injuries sustained to
the petitioner by an act of domestic violence committed by the respondent;
(13) Award possession and care of any pet, along with any moneys necessary to cover
medical costs that may have resulted from abuse of the pet.
4. A verified petition seeking orders for maintenance, support, custody, visitation,
payment of rent, payment of monetary compensation, possession of personal property,
prohibiting the transfer, encumbrance, or disposal of property, or payment for services of a
shelter for victims of domestic violence, shall contain allegations relating to those orders and
shall pray for the orders desired.
5. In making an award of custody, the court shall consider all relevant factors
including the presumption that the best interests of the child will be served by placing the

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 33
child in the custody and care of the nonabusive parent, unless there is evidence that both
parents have engaged in abusive behavior, in which case the court shall not consider this
presumption but may appoint a guardian ad litem or a court-appointed special advocate to
represent the children in accordance with chapter 452 and shall consider all other factors in
accordance with chapter 452.
6. The court shall grant to the noncustodial parent rights to visitation with any minor
child born to or adopted by the parties, unless the court finds, after hearing, that visitation
would endanger the child's physical health, impair the child's emotional development or
would otherwise conflict with the best interests of the child, or that no visitation can be
arranged which would sufficiently protect the custodial parent from further domestic
violence. The court may appoint a guardian ad litem or court-appointed special advocate to
represent the minor child in accordance with chapter 452 whenever the custodial parent
alleges that visitation with the noncustodial parent will damage the minor child.
7. The court shall make an order requiring the noncustodial party to pay an amount
reasonable and necessary for the support of any child to whom the party owes a duty of
support when no prior order of support is outstanding and after all relevant factors have been
considered, in accordance with Missouri supreme court rule 88.01 and chapter 452.
8. The court may grant a maintenance order to a party for a period of time, not to
exceed one hundred eighty days. Any maintenance ordered by the court shall be in
accordance with chapter 452.
9. (1) The court may, in order to ensure that a petitioner can maintain an existing
wireless telephone number or numbers, issue an order, after notice and an opportunity to be
heard, directing a wireless service provider to transfer the billing responsibility for and rights
to the wireless telephone number or numbers to the petitioner, if the petitioner is not the
wireless service accountholder.
(2) (a) The order transferring billing responsibility for and rights to the wireless
telephone number or numbers to the petitioner shall list the name and billing telephone
number of the accountholder, the name and contact information of the person to whom the
telephone number or numbers will be transferred, and each telephone number to be
transferred to that person. The court shall ensure that the contact information of the petitioner
is not provided to the accountholder in proceedings held under this chapter.
(b) Upon issuance, a copy of the full order of protection shall be transmitted, either
electronically or by certified mail, to the wireless service provider's registered agent listed
with the secretary of state, or electronically to the email address provided by the wireless
service provider. Such transmittal shall constitute adequate notice for the wireless service
provider acting under this section and section 455.523.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 34
(c) If the wireless service provider cannot operationally or technically effectuate the
order due to certain circumstances, the wireless service provider shall notify the petitioner
within three business days. Such circumstances shall include, but not be limited to, the
100 following:
101 a. The accountholder has already terminated the account;
102 b. The differences in network technology prevent the functionality of a device on the
103 network; or
104 c. There are geographic or other limitations on network or service availability.
105 (3) (a) Upon transfer of billing responsibility for and rights to a wireless telephone
106 number or numbers to the petitioner under this subsection by a wireless service provider, the
107 petitioner shall assume all financial responsibility for the transferred wireless telephone
108 number or numbers, monthly service costs, and costs for any mobile device associated with
109 the wireless telephone number or numbers.
110 (b) This section shall not preclude a wireless service provider from applying any
111 routine and customary requirements for account establishment to the petitioner as part of this
112 transfer of billing responsibility for a wireless telephone number or numbers and any devices
113 attached to that number or numbers including, but not limited to, identification, financial
114 information, and customer preferences.
115 (4) This section shall not affect the ability of the court to apportion the assets and
116 debts of the parties as provided for in law, or the ability to determine the temporary use,
117 possession, and control of personal property.
118 (5) No cause of action shall lie against any wireless service provider, its officers,
119 employees, or agents, for actions taken in accordance with the terms of a court order issued
120 under this section.
121 (6) As used in this section and section 455.523, a "wireless service provider" means a
122 provider of commercial mobile service under Section 332(d) of the Federal
123 [Telecommunications Act of 1996] Communications Act of 1934 (47 U.S.C. Section
124 [151, et seq.] 332).
537.054. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Child sex trafficking", any act committed by the defendant against the
plaintiff that occurred when the plaintiff was under eighteen years of age and that
would have been a violation of section 566.203, 566.206, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211, or
566.215;
(2) "Injury" or "illness", either a physical injury or illness or a psychological
injury or illness. A psychological injury or illness need not be accompanied by physical
injury or illness.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 35
2. Any action to recover damages from injury or illness caused by child sex
trafficking in an action brought pursuant to this section shall be commenced within
twenty years of the plaintiff attaining twenty-one years of age or within three years of
the date the plaintiff discovers, or reasonably should have discovered, that the injury or
illness was caused by child sex trafficking.
3. This section shall apply to any action commenced on or after August 28, 2026.
542.301. 1. Property which comes into the custody of an officer or of a court as the
result of any seizure and which has not been forfeited pursuant to any other provisions of law
or returned to the claimant shall be disposed of as follows:
(1) Stolen property, or property acquired in any other manner declared an offense by
chapters 569 and 570, but not including any of the property referred to in subdivision (2) of
this subsection, shall be delivered by order of court upon claim having been made and
established, to the person who is entitled to possession:
(a) The claim shall be made by written motion filed with the court with which a
motion to suppress has been, or may be, filed. The claim shall be barred if not made within
one year from the date of the seizure;
(b) Upon the filing of such motion, the judge shall order notice to be given to all
persons interested in the property, including other claimants and the person from whose
possession the property was seized, of the time, place and nature of the hearing to be held on
the motion. The notice shall be given in a manner reasonably calculated to reach the attention
of all interested persons. Notice may be given to unknown persons and to persons whose
address is unknown by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. No
property shall be delivered to any claimant unless all interested persons have been given a
reasonable opportunity to appear and to be heard;
(c) After a hearing, the judge shall order the property delivered to the person or
persons entitled to possession, if any. The judge may direct that delivery of property required
as evidence in a criminal proceeding shall be postponed until the need no longer exists;
(d) A law enforcement officer having custody of seized property may, at any time that
seized property has ceased to be useful as evidence, request that the prosecuting attorney of
the county in which property was seized file a motion with the court of such county for the
disposition of the seized property. If the prosecuting attorney does not file such motion
within sixty days of the request by the law enforcement officer having custody of the seized
property, then such officer may request that the attorney general file a written motion with the
circuit court of the county or judicial district in which the seizure occurred. Upon filing of the
motion, the court shall issue an order directing the disposition of the property. Such
disposition may, if the property is not claimed within one year from the date of the seizure or
if no one establishes a right to it, and the seized property has ceased to be useful as evidence,

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 36
include a public sale of the property. Pursuant to a motion properly filed and granted under
this section, the proceeds of any sale, less necessary expenses of preservation and sale, shall
be paid into the county treasury for the use of the county. If the property is not salable, the
judge may order its destruction. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if no claim is
filed within one year of the seizure and no motion pursuant to this section is filed within six
months thereafter, and the seized property has ceased to be useful as evidence, the property
shall be deemed abandoned, converted to cash and shall be turned over immediately to the
treasurer pursuant to section 447.543;
(e) If the property is a living animal or is perishable, the judge may, at any time, order
it sold at public sale. The proceeds shall be held in lieu of the property. A written description
of the property sold shall be filed with the judge making the order of sale so that the claimant
may identify the property. If the proceeds are not claimed within the time limited for the
claim of the property, the proceeds shall be paid into the county treasury. If the property is
not salable, the judge may order its destruction.
(2) Weapons, tools, devices, computers, computer equipment, computer software,
computer hardware, cellular telephones, or other devices capable of accessing the internet,
and substances other than motor vehicles, aircraft or watercraft, used by the owner or with the
owner's consent as a means for committing felonies other than the offense of possessing
burglary tools in violation of section 569.180, and property, the possession of which is an
offense under the laws of this state or which has been used by the owner, or used with the
owner's acquiescence or consent, as a raw material or as an instrument to manufacture,
produce, or distribute, or be used as a means of storage of anything the possession of which is
an offense under the laws of this state, or which any statute authorizes or directs to be seized,
other than lawfully possessed weapons seized by an officer incident to an arrest, shall be
forfeited to the state of Missouri.
2. The officer who has custody of the property shall inform the prosecuting attorney
of the fact of seizure and of the nature of the property. The prosecuting attorney shall
thereupon file a written motion with the court with which the motion to suppress has been, or
may be, filed praying for an order directing the forfeiture of the property. If the prosecuting
attorney of a county in which property is seized fails to file a motion with the court for the
disposition of the seized property within sixty days of the request by a law enforcement
officer, the officer having custody of the seized property may request the attorney general to
file a written motion with the circuit court of the county or judicial district in which the
seizure occurred. Upon filing of the motion, the court shall issue an order directing the
disposition of the property. The signed motion shall be returned to the requesting agency. A
motion may also be filed by any person claiming the right to possession of the property

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 37
praying that the court declare the property not subject to forfeiture and order it delivered to
the moving party.
3. Upon the filing of a motion either by the prosecuting attorney or by a claimant, the
judge shall order notice to be given to all persons interested in the property, including the
person out of whose possession the property was seized and any lienors, of the time, place
and nature of the hearing to be held on the motion. The notice shall be given in a manner
reasonably calculated to reach the attention of all interested persons. Notice may be given to
unknown persons and to persons of unknown address by publication in a newspaper of
general circulation in the county. Every interested person shall be given a reasonable
opportunity to appear and to be heard as to the nature of the person's claim to the property and
upon the issue of whether or not it is subject to forfeiture.
4. If the evidence is clear and convincing that the property in issue is in fact of a kind
subject to forfeiture under this subsection, the judge shall declare it forfeited and order its
destruction or sale. The judge shall direct that the destruction or sale of property needed as
evidence in a criminal proceeding shall be postponed until this need no longer exists.
5. If the forfeited property can be put to a lawful use, it may be ordered sold after any
alterations which are necessary to adapt it to a lawful use have been made. In the case of
computers, computer equipment, computer software, computer hardware, cellular telephones,
or other devices capable of accessing the internet, or other devices used in the acquisition,
possession, or distribution of child pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, child
sexual abuse material, or obscene material, the law enforcement agency in possession of
such items may, upon court order, retain possession of such property and convert such
property to the use of the law enforcement agency for use in criminal investigations. If there
is a holder of a bona fide lien against property which has been used as a means for committing
an offense or which has been used as a raw material or as an instrument to manufacture or
produce anything which is an offense to possess, who establishes that the use was without the
lienholder's acquiescence or consent, the proceeds, less necessary expenses of preservation
and sale, shall be paid to the lienholder to the amount of the lienholder's lien. The remaining
amount shall be paid into the county treasury.
6. If the property is perishable the judge may order it sold at a public sale or
destroyed, as may be appropriate, prior to a hearing. The proceeds of a sale, less necessary
expenses of preservation and sale, shall be held in lieu of the property.
100 7. When a warrant has been issued to search for and seize allegedly obscene matter
101 for forfeiture to the state, after an adversary hearing, the judge, upon return of the warrant
102 with the matter seized, shall give notice of the fact to the prosecuting attorney of the county in
103 which the matter was seized and the dealer, exhibitor or displayer and shall conduct further
104 adversary proceedings to determine whether the matter is subject to forfeiture. If the evidence

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 38
105 is clear and convincing that the matter is obscene as defined by law and it was being held or
106 displayed for sale, exhibition, distribution or circulation to the public, the judge shall declare
107 it to be obscene and forfeited to the state and order its destruction or other disposition; except
108 that, no forfeiture shall be declared without the dealer, distributor or displayer being given a
109 reasonable opportunity to appear in opposition and without the judge having thoroughly
110 examined each item. If the material to be seized is the same as or another copy of matter that
111 has already been determined to be obscene in a criminal proceeding against the dealer,
112 exhibitor, displayer or such person's agent, the determination of obscenity in the criminal
113 proceeding shall constitute clear and convincing evidence that the matter to be forfeited
114 pursuant to this subsection is obscene. Except when the dealer, exhibitor or displayer
115 consents to a longer period, or by such person's actions or pleadings willfully prevents the
116 prompt resolution of the hearing, judgment shall be rendered within ten days of the return of
117 the warrant. If the matter is not found to be obscene or is not found to have been held or
118 displayed for sale, exhibition or distribution to the public, or a judgment is not entered within
119 the time provided for, the matter shall be restored forthwith to the dealer, exhibitor or
120 displayer.
121 8. If an appeal is taken by the dealer, exhibitor or displayer from an adverse judgment,
122 the case should be assigned for hearing at the earliest practicable date and expedited in every
123 way. Destruction or disposition of a matter declared forfeited shall be postponed until the
124 judgment has become final by exhaustion of appeal, or by expiration of the time for appeal,
125 and until the matter is no longer needed as evidence in a criminal proceeding.
126 9. A determination of obscenity, pursuant to this subsection, shall not be admissible in
127 any criminal proceeding against any person or corporation for sale or possession of obscene
128 matter; except that dealer, distributor or displayer from which the obscene matter was seized
129 for forfeiture to the state.
130 10. When allegedly obscene matter or pornographic material for minors has been
131 seized under a search warrant issued pursuant to subsection 2 of section 542.281 and the
132 matter is no longer needed as evidence in a criminal proceeding the prosecuting attorney of
133 the county in which the matter was seized may file a written motion with the circuit court of
134 the county or judicial district in which the seizure occurred praying for an order directing the
135 forfeiture of the matter. Upon filing of the motion, the court shall set a date for a hearing.
136 Written notice of date, time, place and nature of the hearing shall be personally served upon
137 the owner, dealer, exhibitor, displayer or such person's agent. Such notice shall be served no
138 less than five days before the hearing.
139 11. If the evidence is clear and convincing that the matter is obscene as defined by
140 law, and that the obscene material was being held or displayed for sale, exhibition,
141 distribution or circulation to the public or that the matter is pornographic for minors and that

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 39
142 the pornographic material was being held or displayed for sale, exhibition, distribution or
143 circulation to minors, the judge shall declare it to be obscene or pornographic for minors and
144 forfeited to the state and order its destruction or other disposition. A determination that the
145 matter is obscene in a criminal proceeding as well as a determination that such obscene
146 material was held or displayed for sale, exhibition, distribution or circulation to the public or a
147 determination that the matter is pornographic for minors in a criminal proceeding as well as a
148 determination that such pornographic material was held or displayed for sale, exhibition,
149 distribution or circulation to minors shall be clear and convincing evidence that such material
150 should be forfeited to the state; except that, no forfeiture shall be declared without the dealer,
151 distributor or displayer being given a reasonable opportunity to appear in opposition and
152 without a judge having thoroughly examined each item. A dealer, distributor or displayer
153 shall have had reasonable opportunity to appear in opposition if the matter the prosecutor
154 seeks to destroy is the same matter that formed the basis of a criminal proceeding against the
155 dealer, distributor or displayer where the dealer, distributor or displayer has been charged and
156 found guilty of holding or displaying for sale, exhibiting, distributing or circulating obscene
157 material to the public or pornographic material for minors to minors. If the matter is not
158 found to be obscene, or if obscene material is not found to have been held or displayed for
159 sale, exhibition, distribution or circulation to the public, or if the matter is not found to be
160 pornographic for minors or if pornographic material is not found to have been held or
161 displayed for sale, exhibition, distribution or circulation to minors, the matter shall be restored
162 forthwith to the dealer, exhibitor or displayer.
163 12. If an appeal is taken by the dealer, exhibitor or displayer from an adverse
164 judgment, the case shall be assigned for hearing at the earliest practicable date and expedited
165 in every way. Destruction or disposition of matter declared forfeited shall be postponed until
166 the judgment has become final by exhaustion of appeal, or by expiration of the time for
167 appeal, and until the matter is no longer needed as evidence in a criminal proceeding.
168 13. A determination of obscenity shall not be admissible in any criminal proceeding
169 against any person or corporation for sale or possession of obscene matter.
170 14. An appeal by any party shall be allowed from the judgment of the court as in other
171 civil actions.
172 15. All other property still in the custody of an officer or of a court as the result of any
173 seizure and which has not been forfeited pursuant to this section or any other provision of law
174 after three years following the seizure and which has ceased to be useful as evidence shall be
175 deemed abandoned, converted to cash and shall be turned over immediately to the treasurer
176 pursuant to section 447.543.
566.010. As used in this chapter and chapter 568, the following terms mean:
(1) "Aggravated sexual offense", any sexual offense, in the course of which, the actor:

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 40
(a) Inflicts serious physical injury on the victim;
(b) Displays a deadly weapon or dangerous instrument in a threatening manner;
(c) Subjects the victim to sexual intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse with more
than one person;
(d) Had previously been found guilty of an offense under this chapter or under section
573.200, child used in sexual performance; section 573.205, promoting sexual performance
by a child; section 573.023, sexual exploitation of a minor; section 573.025, promoting child
pornography in the first degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or promoting child
sexual abuse material in the first degree; section 573.035, promoting child pornography in
the second degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or promoting child sexual abuse
material in the second degree; section 573.037, possession of child pornography as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026, or possession of child sexual abuse material; or section
573.040, furnishing pornographic materials to minors; or has previously been found guilty of
an offense in another jurisdiction which would constitute an offense under this chapter or said
sections;
(e) Commits the offense as part of an act or series of acts performed by two or more
persons as part of an established or prescribed pattern of activity; or
(f) Engages in the act that constitutes the offense with a person the actor knows to be,
without regard to legitimacy, the actor's:
a. Ancestor or descendant by blood or adoption;
b. Stepchild while the marriage creating that relationship exists;
c. Brother or sister of the whole or half blood; or
d. Uncle, aunt, nephew, or niece of the whole blood;
(2) "Commercial sex act", any sex act on account of which anything of value is given
to or received by any person;
(3) "Deviate sexual intercourse", any act involving the genitals of one person and the
hand, mouth, tongue, or anus of another person or a sexual act involving the penetration,
however slight, of the penis, female genitalia, or the anus by a finger, instrument or object
done for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any person or for the
purpose of terrorizing the victim;
(4) "Forced labor", a condition of servitude induced by means of:
(a) Any scheme, plan, or pattern of behavior intended to cause a person to believe
that, if the person does not enter into or continue the servitude, such person or another person
will suffer substantial bodily harm or physical restraint; or
(b) The abuse or threatened abuse of the legal process;
(5) "Sexual conduct", sexual intercourse, deviate sexual intercourse or sexual contact;

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 41
(6) "Sexual contact", any touching of another person with the genitals or any touching
of the genitals or anus of another person, or the breast of a female person, or such touching
through the clothing, or causing semen, seminal fluid, or other ejaculate to come into contact
with another person, for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any person
or for the purpose of terrorizing the victim;
(7) "Sexual intercourse", any penetration, however slight, of the female genitalia by
the penis.
566.147. 1. Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or hereafter has been found
guilty of:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the provisions of section
568.020, incest; section 568.045, endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree;
subsection 2 of section 568.080 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or section 573.200, use
of a child in a sexual performance; section 568.090 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or
section 573.205, promoting a sexual performance by a child; section 573.023, sexual
exploitation of a minor; section 573.025, promoting child pornography in the first degree as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026, or promoting child sexual abuse material in the first
degree; section 573.035, promoting child pornography in the second degree as it existed
prior to August 28, 2026, or promoting child sexual abuse material in the second degree;
section 573.037, possession of child pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or
possession of child sexual abuse material; or section 573.040, furnishing pornographic
material to minors; or
(2) Any offense in any other jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be a
violation listed in this section;

shall not reside within one thousand feet of any public school as defined in section 160.011,
any private school giving instruction in a grade or grades not higher than the twelfth grade, or
any child care facility that is licensed under chapter 210, or any child care facility as defined
in section 210.201 that is exempt from state licensure but subject to state regulation under
section 210.252 and holds itself out to be a child care facility, where the school or facility is in
existence at the time the individual begins to reside at the location. Such person shall also not
reside within one thousand feet of the property line of the residence of a former victim of such
person.
2. If such person has already established a residence and a public school, a private
school, or child care facility is subsequently built or placed within one thousand feet of such
person's residence, or a former victim subsequently resides on property with a property line
within one thousand feet of such person's residence, then such person shall, within one week
of the opening of such public school, private school, or child care facility, or the former

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 42
victim residing on the property, notify the county sheriff where such public school, private
school, child care facility, or residence of a former victim is located that he or she is now
residing within one thousand feet of such public school, private school, child care facility, or
property line of the residence of a former victim, and shall provide verifiable proof to the
sheriff that he or she resided there prior to the opening of such public school, private school,
or child care facility, or the former victim residing on the property.
3. For purposes of this section, "resides" means sleeps in a residence, which may
include more than one location and may be mobile or transitory, but shall not include
transitory or longer term presence in facilities licensed under chapters 197 and 198 for
purposes of receiving care, treatment, or services from such licensed facility.
4. For the purposes of [the] thissection, one thousand feet shall be measured from the
edge of the offender's property nearest the public school, private school, child care facility, or
former victim to the nearest edge of the public school, private school, child care facility, or
former victim's property.
5. Violation of the provisions of subsection 1 of this section is a class E felony except
that the second or any subsequent violation is a class B felony. Violation of the provisions of
subsection 2 of this section is a class A misdemeanor except that the second or subsequent
violation is a class E felony.
566.148. 1. Any person who has been found guilty of:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the provisions of section
568.020, incest; section 568.045, endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree;
subsection 2 of section 568.080 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or section 573.200, use
of a child in a sexual performance; section 568.090 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or
section 573.205, promoting a sexual performance by a child; section 573.023, sexual
exploitation of a minor; section 573.025, promoting child pornography in the first degree as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026, or promoting child sexual abuse material in the first
degree; section 573.035, promoting child pornography in the second degree as it existed
prior to August 28, 2026, or promoting child sexual abuse material in the second degree;
section 573.037, possession of child pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or
possession of child sexual abuse material; or section 573.040, furnishing pornographic
material to minors; or
(2) Any offense in any other jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be a
violation listed in this section;

shall not knowingly be physically present in or loiter within five hundred feet of or to
approach, contact, or communicate with any child under eighteen years of age in any child
care facility building, on the real property comprising any child care facility when persons

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 43
under the age of eighteen are present in the building, on the grounds, or in the conveyance,
unless the offender is a parent, legal guardian, or custodian of a student present in the building
or on the grounds.
2. For purposes of this section, "child care facility" shall include any child care
facility licensed under chapter 210, or any child care facility that is exempt from state
licensure but subject to state regulation under section 210.252 and holds itself out to be a
child care facility.
3. Violation of the provisions of this section is a class A misdemeanor.
566.149. 1. Any person who has been found guilty of:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the provisions of section
568.020, incest; section 568.045, endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree;
subsection 2 of section 568.080 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or section 573.200, use
of a child in a sexual performance; section 568.090 as it existed prior to January 1, 2017, or
section 573.205, promoting a sexual performance by a child; section 573.023, sexual
exploitation of a minor; section 573.037, possession of child pornography as it existed prior
to August 28, 2026, or possession of child sexual abuse material; section 573.025,
promoting child pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or promoting child
sexual abuse material; or section 573.040, furnishing pornographic material to minors; or
(2) Any offense in any other jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be a
violation listed in this section;

shall not be present in or loiter within five hundred feet of any school building, on real
property comprising any school, or in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a
school to transport students to or from school or a school-related activity when persons under
the age of eighteen are present in the building, on the grounds, or in the conveyance, unless
the offender is a parent, legal guardian, or custodian of a student present in the building and
has met the conditions set forth in subsection 2 of this section.
2. No parent, legal guardian, or custodian who has been found guilty of violating any
of the offenses listed in subsection 1 of this section shall be present in any school building, on
real property comprising any school, or in any conveyance owned, leased, or contracted by a
school to transport students to or from school or a school-related activity when persons under
the age of eighteen are present in the building, on the grounds or in the conveyance unless the
parent, legal guardian, or custodian has permission to be present from the superintendent or
school board or in the case of a private school from the principal. In the case of a public
school, if permission is granted, the superintendent or school board president must inform the
principal of the school where the sex offender will be present. Permission may be granted by
the superintendent, school board, or in the case of a private school from the principal for more

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 44
than one event at a time, such as a series of events, however, the parent, legal guardian, or
custodian must obtain permission for any other event he or she wishes to attend for which he
or she has not yet had permission granted.
3. Regardless of the person's knowledge of his or her proximity to school property or
a school-related activity, violation of the provisions of this section is a class A misdemeanor.
566.150. 1. Any person who has been found guilty of:
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the provisions of section
568.020, incest; section 568.045, endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree;
section 573.200, use of a child in a sexual performance; section 573.205, promoting a sexual
performance by a child; section 573.023, sexual exploitation of a minor; section 573.025,
promoting child pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or promoting child
sexual abuse material; section 573.037, possession of child pornography as it existed prior
to August 28, 2026, or possession of child sexual abuse material; or section 573.040,
furnishing pornographic material to minors; or
(2) Any offense in any other jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be a
violation listed in this section;

shall not knowingly be present in or loiter within five hundred feet of any real property
comprising any public park with playground equipment, a public swimming pool, athletic
complex or athletic fields if such facilities exist for the primary use of recreation for children,
any museum if such museum holds itself out to the public as and exists with the primary
purpose of entertaining or educating children under eighteen years of age, or Missouri
department of conservation nature or education center properties.
2. The first violation of the provisions of this section is a class E felony.
3. A second or subsequent violation of this section is a class D felony.
4. Any person who has been found guilty of an offense under subdivision (1) or (2) of
subsection 1 of this section who is the parent, legal guardian, or custodian of a child under the
age of eighteen attending a program on the property of a nature or education center of the
Missouri department of conservation may receive permission from the nature or education
center manager to be present on the property with the child during the program.
566.151. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "Evie and Sophie's
Law".
2. For purposes of this section, "minor" means a person under eighteen years of
age.
3. A person [twenty-one years of age or older] commits the offense of grooming or
enticement of a [child] minor if, being more than four years older than a minor, he or she
knowingly, by any means or through any pattern of conduct, attempts to persuade,

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 45
solicit, coax, entice, or lure or persuades, solicits, coaxes, entices, or lures [whether by
words, actions or through communication via the internet or any electronic communication,
any person who is less than seventeen years of age for the purpose of engaging in sexual
conduct] such minor with the intent to prepare, condition, manipulate, or otherwise
cause such minor to engage in sexual conduct, a sexual performance, or a commercial
sex act.
[2.] 4. It is not a defense to a prosecution for a violation of this section that the [other]
person believed to be a minor was a peace officer masquerading as a minor.
[3.] 5. Grooming or enticement of a [child or an attempt to commit enticement of a
child] minor is a felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment shall be not less than
five years and not more than thirty years, unless the grooming or enticement results in the
minor engaging in sexual conduct, a sexual performance, or a commercial sex act, in
which case the minimum authorized term of imprisonment shall be not less than ten
years. No person convicted and sentenced to the department of corrections under this
section shall be eligible for parole[, probation,] or conditional release[, or suspended
imposition or execution of sentence] for a period of five calendar years, unless the grooming
or enticement results in the minor engaging in sexual conduct, a sexual performance, or
a commercial sex act, in which case the person shall not be eligible for parole, probation,
conditional release, or suspended imposition or execution of sentence for a period of ten
calendar years. Upon conviction, the punishment imposed under this subsection shall
be in addition and consecutive to any punishment provided by law for any crime
committed as a result of the offense committed under this section.
6. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 557.011, 558.019, and 559.021 to
the contrary, a person found guilty of violating this section shall be ordered by the
sentencing court to pay restitution to the victim of the offense. The minimum restitution
ordered by the court for such victim shall be in the amount determined by the court
necessary to compensate the victim for the mental and physical rehabilitation of the
victim, any lost income or educational disruption, or relocation or housing assistance for
the victim.
7. The committee within the statewide council established under section
210.1505 shall issue guidance for:
(1) The public on identifying and recognizing actions constituting grooming or
enticement of a minor, responding to potential instances of grooming of a minor, and
treatment of and services for victims of grooming; and
(2) Procedures and training for professionals on the investigating and
prosecuting of perpetrators of the offense of grooming or enticement of a minor.
566.155. 1. Any person who has been found guilty of:

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 46
(1) Violating any of the provisions of this chapter or the provisions of section
568.020, incest; section 568.045, endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree;
section 573.200, use of a child in a sexual performance; section 573.205, promoting a sexual
performance by a child; section 573.023, sexual exploitation of a minor; section 573.037,
possession of child pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or possession of
child sexual abuse material; section 573.025, promoting child pornography as it existed
prior to August 28, 2026, or promoting child sexual abuse material; or section 573.040,
furnishing pornographic material to minors; or
(2) Any offense in any other jurisdiction which, if committed in this state, would be a
violation listed in this section;

shall not serve as an athletic coach, manager, or athletic trainer for any sports team in which a
child less than seventeen years of age is a member or shall not supervise or employ any child
under eighteen years of age.
2. The first violation of the provisions of this section is a class E felony.
3. A second or subsequent violation of this section is a class D felony.
566.201. A prosecuting or circuit attorney may request assistance from the
attorney general, or one of his or her assistants, to assist in the prosecution of child sex
trafficking cases. The prosecuting or circuit attorney may request any resource or
capability of the attorney general when prosecuting such cases.
566.211. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the
second degree if he or she knowingly:
(1) Recruits, entices, harbors, transports, provides, or obtains by any means, including
but not limited to through the use of force, abduction, coercion, fraud, deception, blackmail,
or causing or threatening to cause financial harm, a person under the age of eighteen to
participate in a commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual
material as defined in section 573.010, or benefits, financially or by receiving anything of
value, from participation in such activities;
(2) Causes a person under the age of eighteen to engage in a commercial sex act, a
sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as defined in section
573.010; or
(3) Advertises the availability of a person under the age of eighteen to participate in a
commercial sex act, a sexual performance, or the production of explicit sexual material as
defined in section 573.010.
2. It shall not be a defense that the defendant believed that the person was eighteen
years of age or older.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 47
3. (1) The offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree is a felony
punishable by imprisonment for a term of years not less than twenty years or life and a fine
not to exceed two hundred fifty thousand dollars if the child is under the age of eighteen. If a
violation of this section was effected by force, abduction, or coercion, the crime of sexual
trafficking of a child shall be a felony for which the authorized term of imprisonment is life
imprisonment without eligibility for probation or parole until the defendant has served not
less than twenty-five years of such sentence.
(2) The offense of sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree by a parent,
legal guardian, or other person having custody or control of a child is a felony for which
the authorized term of imprisonment is life imprisonment. As used in this subdivision,
"life imprisonment" shall mean imprisonment for the duration of a person's natural
life.
566.218. 1. Notwithstanding sections 557.011, 558.019, and 559.021, a person found
guilty of violating any provisions of section 566.203, 566.206, 566.209, 566.210, 566.211,
566.212, 566.213, or 566.215 shall be ordered by the sentencing court to pay restitution to the
victim of the offense regardless of whether the defendant is sentenced to a term of
imprisonment or probation. The minimum restitution ordered by the court shall be in the
amount determined by the court necessary to compensate the victim for the value of the
victim's labor and/or for the mental and physical rehabilitation of the victim and any child of
the victim.
2. Any real or personal property owned by the defendant that was used,
attempted to be used, or intended to be used by the defendant in violating a section listed
under subsection 1 of this section may be seized. If such property is seized, the property
shall be forfeited as provided under section 513.607.
567.030. 1. A person commits the offense of patronizing prostitution if he or she:
(1) Pursuant to a prior understanding, gives something of value to another person as
compensation for having engaged in sexual conduct with any person; or
(2) Gives or agrees to give something of value to another person with the
understanding that such person or another person will engage in sexual conduct with any
person; or
(3) Solicits or requests another person to engage in sexual conduct with any person in
return for something of value.
2. It shall not be a defense that the person believed that the individual he or she
patronized for prostitution was eighteen years of age or older.
3. The offense of patronizing prostitution is a class [B misdemeanor] E felony, unless
the individual who the person patronizes is less than eighteen years of age but older than
fifteen years of age, in which case patronizing prostitution is a class [E] D felony.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 48
4. The offense of patronizing prostitution is a class B felony if the individual who the
person patronizes is fifteen years of age or younger. Nothing in this section shall preclude the
prosecution of an individual for the offenses of:
(1) Statutory rape in the first degree pursuant to section 566.032;
(2) Statutory rape in the second degree pursuant to section 566.034;
(3) Statutory sodomy in the first degree pursuant to section 566.062; or
(4) Statutory sodomy in the second degree pursuant to section 566.064.
573.010. As used in this chapter the following terms shall mean:
(1) "Adult cabaret", a nightclub, bar, juice bar, restaurant, bottle club, or other
commercial establishment, regardless of whether alcoholic beverages are served, which
regularly features persons who appear semi-nude;
(2) "Characterized by", describing the essential character or dominant theme of an
item;
(3) "Child", any person under the age of fourteen;
(4) "Child [pornography] sexual abuse material":
(a) Any obscene material or performance depicting sexual conduct, sexual contact as
defined in section 566.010, or a sexual performance and which has as one of its participants or
portrays as an observer of such conduct, contact, or performance a minor; [or]
(b) Any visual depiction, including any photograph, film, video, picture, or computer
or computer-generated image or picture, whether made or produced by electronic,
mechanical, or other means, of sexually explicit conduct where:
a. The production of such visual depiction involves the use of a minor engaging in
sexually explicit conduct;
b. Such visual depiction is a digital image, computer image, or computer-generated
image that is, or is indistinguishable from, that of a minor engaging in sexually explicit
conduct, in that the depiction is such that an ordinary person viewing the depiction would
conclude that the depiction is of an actual minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct,
regardless of whether the minor was actually engaged in sexually explicit conduct at the
time the visual depiction was created; or
c. Such visual depiction has been created, adapted, or modified to show that an
identifiable minor is engaging in sexually explicit conduct. "Identifiable minor" means a
person who was a minor at the time the visual depiction was created, adapted, or modified; or
whose image as a minor was used in creating, adapting, or modifying the visual depiction;
and who is recognizable as an actual person by the person's face, likeness, or other
distinguishing characteristic, such as a unique birthmark or other recognizable feature. The
term identifiable minor shall not be construed to require proof of the actual identity of the
identifiable minor; or

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 49
(c) Any anatomically correct doll, mannequin, or robot, or any other item, with
features of, or with features that resemble those of, a minor under eighteen years of age
intended to be used for the purpose of arousing or gratifying the sexual desire of any
person, or for the purpose of terrorizing or causing emotional distress to any person;
(5) "Employ", "employee", or "employment", any person who performs any service
on the premises of a sexually oriented business, on a full-time, part-time, or contract basis,
whether or not the person is denominated an employee, independent contractor, agent, or
otherwise. Employee does not include a person exclusively on the premises for repair or
maintenance of the premises or for the delivery of goods to the premises;
(6) "Explicit sexual material", any pictorial or three-dimensional material depicting
human masturbation, deviate sexual intercourse, sexual intercourse, direct physical
stimulation or unclothed genitals, sadomasochistic abuse, or emphasizing the depiction of
postpubertal human genitals; provided, however, that works of art or of anthropological
significance shall not be deemed to be within the foregoing definition;
(7) "Furnish", to issue, sell, give, provide, lend, mail, deliver, transfer, circulate,
disseminate, present, exhibit or otherwise provide;
(8) "Material", anything printed or written, or any picture, drawing, photograph,
motion picture film, videotape or videotape production, or pictorial representation, or any
recording or transcription, or any mechanical, chemical, or electrical reproduction, or stored
computer data, or anything which is or may be used as a means of communication. Material
includes undeveloped photographs, molds, printing plates, stored computer data and other
latent representational objects;
(9) "Minor", any person less than eighteen years of age;
(10) "Nudity" or "state of nudity", the showing of the human genitals, pubic area,
vulva, anus, anal cleft, or the female breast with less than a fully opaque covering of any part
of the nipple or areola;
(11) "Obscene", any material or performance if, taken as a whole:
(a) Applying contemporary community standards, its predominant appeal is to
prurient interest in sex; and
(b) The average person, applying contemporary community standards, would find the
material depicts or describes sexual conduct in a patently offensive way; and
(c) A reasonable person would find the material lacks serious literary, artistic,
political or scientific value;
(12) "Operator", any person on the premises of a sexually oriented business who
causes the business to function, puts or keeps the business in operation, or is authorized to
manage the business or exercise overall operational control of the business premises. A

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 50
person may be found to be operating or causing to be operated a sexually oriented business
whether or not such person is an owner, part owner, or licensee of the business;
(13) "Performance", any play, motion picture film, videotape, dance or exhibition
performed before an audience of one or more;
(14) "Pornographic for minors", any material or performance if the following apply:
(a) The average person, applying contemporary community standards, would find
that the material or performance, taken as a whole, has a tendency to cater or appeal to a
prurient interest of minors; and
(b) The material or performance depicts or describes nudity, sexual conduct, the
condition of human genitals when in a state of sexual stimulation or arousal, or
sadomasochistic abuse in a way which is patently offensive to the average person applying
contemporary adult community standards with respect to what is suitable for minors; and
(c) The material or performance, taken as a whole, lacks serious literary, artistic,
political, or scientific value for minors;
(15) "Premises", the real property upon which a sexually oriented business is located,
and all appurtenances thereto and buildings thereon, including but not limited to the sexually
oriented business, the grounds, private walkways, and parking lots or parking garages or both;
(16) "Promote", to manufacture, issue, sell, provide, mail, deliver, transfer, transmute,
publish, distribute, circulate, disseminate, present, exhibit, or advertise, or to offer or agree to
do the same, by any means including a computer;
(17) "Regularly", the consistent and repeated doing of the act so described;
(18) "Sadomasochistic abuse", flagellation or torture by or upon a person as an act of
sexual stimulation or gratification;
(19) "Semi-nude" or "state of semi-nudity", the showing of the female breast below a
horizontal line across the top of the areola and extending across the width of the breast at such
point, or the showing of the male or female buttocks. Such definition includes the lower
portion of the human female breast, but shall not include any portion of the cleavage of the
female breasts exhibited by a bikini, dress, blouse, shirt, leotard, or similar wearing apparel
provided the areola is not exposed in whole or in part;
(20) "Sexual conduct", actual or simulated, normal or perverted acts of human
masturbation; deviate sexual intercourse; sexual intercourse; or physical contact with a
person's clothed or unclothed genitals, pubic area, buttocks, or the breast of a female in an act
of apparent sexual stimulation or gratification or any sadomasochistic abuse or acts including
100 animals or any latent objects in an act of apparent sexual stimulation or gratification;
101 (21) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
102 (a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-
103 anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex;

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 51
104 (b) Bestiality;
105 (c) Masturbation;
106 (d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
107 (e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person;
108 (22) "Sexually oriented business" includes:
109 (a) An adult bookstore or adult video store. "Adult bookstore" or "adult video store"
110 means a commercial establishment which, as one of its principal business activities, offers for
111 sale or rental for any form of consideration any one or more of the following: books,
112 magazines, periodicals, or other printed matter, or photographs, films, motion pictures, video
113 cassettes, compact discs, digital video discs, slides, or other visual representations which are
114 characterized by their emphasis upon the display of specified sexual activities or specified
115 anatomical areas. A principal business activity exists where the commercial establishment:
116 a. Has a substantial portion of its displayed merchandise which consists of such
117 items; or
118 b. Has a substantial portion of the wholesale value of its displayed merchandise
119 which consists of such items; or
120 c. Has a substantial portion of the retail value of its displayed merchandise which
121 consists of such items; or
122 d. Derives a substantial portion of its revenues from the sale or rental, for any form of
123 consideration, of such items; or
124 e. Maintains a substantial section of its interior business space for the sale or rental of
125 such items; or
126 f. Maintains an adult arcade. "Adult arcade" means any place to which the public is
127 permitted or invited wherein coin-operated or slug-operated or electronically, electrically, or
128 mechanically controlled still or motion picture machines, projectors, or other image-
129 producing devices are regularly maintained to show images to five or fewer persons per
130 machine at any one time, and where the images so displayed are characterized by their
131 emphasis upon matter exhibiting specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas;
132 (b) An adult cabaret;
133 (c) An adult motion picture theater. "Adult motion picture theater" means a
134 commercial establishment where films, motion pictures, video cassettes, slides, or similar
135 photographic reproductions, which are characterized by their emphasis upon the display of
136 specified sexual activities or specified anatomical areas are regularly shown to more than five
137 persons for any form of consideration;
138 (d) A semi-nude model studio. "Semi-nude model studio" means a place where
139 persons regularly appear in a state of semi-nudity for money or any form of consideration in
140 order to be observed, sketched, drawn, painted, sculptured, photographed, or similarly

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 52
141 depicted by other persons. Such definition shall not apply to any place where persons
142 appearing in a state of semi-nudity do so in a modeling class operated:
143 a. By a college, junior college, or university supported entirely or partly by taxation;
144 b. By a private college or university which maintains and operates educational
145 programs in which credits are transferable to a college, junior college, or university supported
146 entirely or partly by taxation; or
147 c. In a structure:
148 (i) Which has no sign visible from the exterior of the structure and no other
149 advertising that indicates a semi-nude person is available for viewing; and
150 (ii) Where, in order to participate in a class, a student must enroll at least three days in
151 advance of the class;
152 (e) A sexual encounter center. "Sexual encounter center" means a business or
153 commercial enterprise that, as one of its principal purposes, purports to offer for any form of
154 consideration physical contact in the form of wrestling or tumbling between two or more
155 persons when one or more of the persons is semi-nude;
156 (23) "Sexual performance", any performance, or part thereof, which includes sexual
157 conduct by a child who is less than eighteen years of age;
158 (24) "Specified anatomical areas" include:
159 (a) Less than completely and opaquely covered: human genitals, pubic region,
160 buttock, and female breast below a point immediately above the top of the areola; and
161 (b) Human male genitals in a discernibly turgid state, even if completely and
162 opaquely covered;
163 (25) "Specified sexual activity", includes any of the following:
164 (a) Intercourse, oral copulation, masturbation, or sodomy; or
165 (b) Excretory functions as a part of or in connection with any of the activities
166 described in paragraph (a) of this subdivision;
167 (26) "Substantial", at least thirty percent of the item or items so modified;
168 (27) "Visual depiction", includes undeveloped film and videotape, and data stored on
169 computer disk or by electronic means which is capable of conversion into a visual image.
573.023. 1. A person commits the offense of sexual exploitation of a minor if such
person knowingly or recklessly photographs, films, videotapes, produces or otherwise creates
obscene material with a minor or child [pornography] sexual abuse material.
2. The offense of sexual exploitation of a minor is a class B felony unless the minor is
a child, in which case it is a class A felony.
573.025. 1. A person commits the offense of promoting child [pornography] sexual
abuse material in the first degree if, knowing of its content and character, such person
possesses with the intent to promote or promotes child [pornography] sexual abuse material

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 53
of a child less than fourteen years of age or obscene material portraying what appears to be a
child less than fourteen years of age.
2. The offense of promoting child [pornography] sexual abuse material in the first
degree is a class B felony unless the person knowingly promotes such material to a minor, in
which case it is a class A felony. No person who is found guilty of promoting child
[pornography] sexual abuse material in the first degree shall be eligible for probation,
parole, or conditional release for a period of three calendar years.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a provider of electronic
communication services or remote computing services to monitor any user, subscriber or
customer of the provider, or the content of any communication of any user, subscriber or
customer of the provider.
573.035. 1. A person commits the offense of promoting child [pornography] sexual
abuse material in the second degree if, knowing of its content and character, such person
possesses with the intent to promote or promotes child [pornography] sexual abuse material
of a minor under the age of eighteen or obscene material portraying what appears to be a
minor under the age of eighteen.
2. The offense of promoting child [pornography] sexual abuse material in the
second degree is a class D felony unless the person knowingly promotes such material to a
minor, in which case it is a class B felony. No person who is found guilty of promoting child
[pornography] sexual abuse material in the second degree shall be eligible for probation.
573.037. 1. A person commits the offense of possession of child [pornography]
sexual abuse material if such person knowingly or recklessly possesses any child
[pornography] sexual abuse material of a minor less than eighteen years of age or obscene
material portraying what appears to be a minor less than eighteen years of age.
2. The offense of possession of child [pornography] sexual abuse material is a class
D felony if the person possesses one still image of child [pornography] sexual abuse
materialor one obscene still image. The offense of possession of child [pornography] sexual
abuse material is a class B felony if the person:
(1) Possesses:
(a) More than twenty still images of child [pornography] sexual abuse material; or
(b) More than twenty obscene still images; or
(c) Child [pornography] sexual abuse material comprised of one motion picture,
film, videotape, videotape production, or other moving image; or
(d) Obscene material comprised of one motion picture, film, videotape production, or
other moving image; or
(2) Has previously been found guilty of an offense under this section.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 54
3. A person who has committed the offense of possession of child [pornography]
sexual abuse material is subject to separate punishments for each item of child
[pornography] sexual abuse material or obscene material possessed by the person.
573.038. 1. In any criminal proceeding, any property or material that constitutes
child pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or child sexual abuse material
shall remain in the care, custody, and control of either the state or the court.
2. (1) Notwithstanding Missouri rule of criminal procedure 25.03 or any other rule or
statute to the contrary, a court shall deny, in any criminal proceeding, any request by the
defendant to copy, photograph, duplicate, or otherwise reproduce any property or material
that constitutes child pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or child sexual
abuse material, so long as the state makes the property or material reasonably available to
the defendant.
(2) For the purposes of subdivision (1) of this subsection, property or material shall
be deemed to be reasonably available to the defendant if the state provides ample opportunity
for inspection, viewing, and examination at a state or other governmental facility of the
property or material by the defendant, his or her attorney, and any individual the defendant
may seek to qualify to furnish expert testimony at trial.
573.050. 1. In any prosecution under this chapter evidence shall be admissible to
show:
(1) What the predominant appeal of the material or performance would be for
ordinary adults or minors;
(2) The literary, artistic, political or scientific value of the material or performance;
(3) The degree of public acceptance in this state and in the local community;
(4) The appeal to prurient interest in advertising or other promotion of the material or
performance;
(5) The purpose of the author, creator, promoter, furnisher or publisher of the material
or performance.
2. Testimony of the author, creator, promoter, furnisher, publisher, or expert
testimony, relating to factors entering into the determination of the issues of obscenity or child
pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or child sexual abuse material, shall
be admissible.
3. In any prosecution under this chapter, when it becomes necessary to determine
whether a person was less than seventeen or eighteen years of age, the court or jury may make
this determination by any of the following methods:
(1) Personal inspection of the child;
(2) Inspection of the photograph or motion picture that shows the child engaging in
the sexual performance;

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 55
(3) Oral testimony by a witness to the sexual performance as to the age of the child
based on the child's appearance at the time;
(4) Expert medical testimony based on the appearance of the child engaging in the
sexual performance; or
(5) Any other method authorized by law or by the rules of evidence.
4. In any prosecution for promoting child pornography in the first or second degree as
it existed prior to August 28, 2026, or for promoting child sexual abuse material in the
first or second degree, no showing is required that the performance or material involved
appeals to prurient interest, that it lacks serious literary, artistic, political or scientific value, or
that it is patently offensive to prevailing standards in the community as a whole.
573.052. Upon receipt of any information that child [pornography] sexual abuse
material as defined in section 573.010 is contained on a website, the attorney general shall
investigate such information. If the attorney general has probable cause to believe the
website contains child [pornography] sexual abuse material, the attorney general shall notify
a website operator of any child [pornography] sexual abuse material site residing on that
website operator's server, in writing. If the website operator promptly, but in no event longer
than five days after receiving notice, removes the alleged [pornography] material from its
server, and so long as the website operator is not the purveyor of such child [pornography]
sexual abuse material, it shall be immune from civil liability. If the website operator does
not promptly remove the alleged [pornography] material, the attorney general may seek an
injunction pursuant to section 573.070 to remove the child [pornography] sexual abuse
material site from the website operator's server. This section shall not be construed to create
any defense to any criminal charges brought pursuant to this chapter.
573.110. 1. This section and sections 571.112 and 573.114 shall be known and
may be cited as "Evan's Voice Act".
2. As used in this section and [section] sections 573.112 and 573.114, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Computer", a device that accepts, processes, stores, retrieves, or outputs data and
includes, but is not limited to, auxiliary storage and telecommunications devices connected to
computers;
(2) "Computer program", a series of coded instructions or statements in a form
acceptable to a computer that causes the computer to process data and supply the results of the
data processing;
(3) "Data", a representation in any form of information, knowledge, facts, concepts,
or instructions including, but not limited to, program documentation, that is prepared or has
been prepared in a formalized manner and is stored or processed in or transmitted by a
computer or in a system or network. Data is considered property and may be in any form

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 56
including, but not limited to, printouts, magnetic or optical storage media, punch cards, data
stored internally in the memory of the computer, or data stored externally that is accessible by
the computer;
(4) "Image", a photograph, film, videotape, digital recording, or other depiction or
portrayal of an object, including a human body;
(5) "Intimate parts", the fully unclothed, partially unclothed, or transparently clothed
genitals, pubic area, or anus or, if the person is female, a partially or fully exposed nipple,
including exposure through transparent clothing;
(6) "Private mobile radio services", private land mobile radio services and other
communications services characterized by the public service commission as private mobile
radio services;
(7) "Public mobile services", air-to-ground radio telephone services, cellular radio
telecommunications services, offshore radio, rural radio services, public land mobile
telephone services, and other common carrier radio communications services;
(8) "Sexual act", sexual penetration, masturbation, or sexual activity;
(9) "Sexual activity", any:
(a) Knowing touching or fondling by the victim or another person or animal, either
directly or through clothing, of the sex organs, anus, or breast of the victim or another person
or animal for the purpose of sexual gratification or arousal;
(b) Transfer or transmission of semen upon any part of the clothed or unclothed body
of the victim for the purpose of sexual gratification or arousal of the victim or another;
(c) Act of urination within a sexual context;
(d) Bondage, fetter, sadism, or masochism; or
(e) Sadomasochism abuse in any sexual context.
[2.] 3. A person commits the offense of nonconsensual dissemination of private
sexual images if he or she:
(1) Intentionally disseminates an image with the intent to harass, threaten, or coerce
another person:
(a) [Who is at least eighteen years of age;
(b)] Who is identifiable from the image itself or information displayed in connection
with the image; and
[(c)] (b) Who is engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed, in whole
or in part;
(2) Obtains the image under circumstances in which a reasonable person would know
or understand that the image was to remain private; and
(3) Knows or should have known that the person in the image did not consent to the
dissemination.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 57
[3.] 4. The following activities are exempt from the provisions of this section:
(1) The intentional dissemination of an image of another identifiable person who is
engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed if the dissemination is made for
the purpose of a criminal investigation that is otherwise lawful;
(2) The intentional dissemination of an image of another identifiable person who is
engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed if the dissemination is for the
purpose of, or in connection with, the reporting of unlawful conduct;
(3) The intentional dissemination of an image of another identifiable person who is
engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed if the image involves voluntary
exposure in a public or commercial setting; or
(4) The intentional dissemination of an image of another identifiable person who is
engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed if the dissemination serves a
lawful public purpose.
[4.] 5. Nothing in this section shall be construed to impose liability upon the
following entities solely as a result of content or information provided by another person:
(1) An interactive computer service, as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 230(f)(2);
(2) A provider of public mobile services or private mobile radio services; or
(3) A telecommunications network or broadband provider.
[5.] 6. A person convicted under this section is subject to the forfeiture provisions
under sections 513.600 to 513.660.
[6.] 7. The offense of nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is a class
D felony, unless the image was of a minor or of a vulnerable person, in which case it is a
class C felony.
[7.] 8. In addition to the criminal penalties listed in subsection 6 of this section, the
person in violation of the provisions of this section shall also be subject to a private cause of
action from the depicted person. Any successful private cause of action brought under this
subsection shall result in an award equal to ten thousand dollars or actual damages, whichever
is greater, and in addition shall include attorney's fees. Humiliation or embarrassment shall
be an adequate showing that the plaintiff has incurred damages; however, no physical
manifestation of either humiliation or embarrassment is necessary for damages to be shown.
573.112. 1. A person commits the offense of threatening the nonconsensual
dissemination of private sexual images if he or she gains or attempts to gain anything of
value, or coerces or attempts to coerce another person to act or refrain from acting, by
threatening to disseminate an image of another person, which was obtained under
circumstances in which a reasonable person would know or understand that the image was
to remain private, against the will of such person:
(1) [Who is at least eighteen years of age;

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 58
(2)] Who is identifiable from the image itself or information displayed in connection
with the image; and
[(3)] (2) Who is engaged in a sexual act or whose intimate parts are exposed, in whole
or in part.
2. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) or (3) of this subsection, the offense
of threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is a class E felony,
unless it is a second offense, in which case it is a class D felony. Any third or subsequent
offense of threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is a
class C felony.
(2) If the image was of a minor or of a vulnerable person, the offense of
threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is a class B felony.
(3) If the threat of the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is
the proximate cause of serious physical injury or death of a person, the offense of
threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images is a class B felony.
573.114. Notwithstanding the provisions of sections 557.011, 558.019, and
559.021 to the contrary, a person found guilty of violating section 573.110 or 573.112
shall be ordered by the sentencing court to pay restitution to the victim of the offense.
The minimum restitution for a victim of a person found guilty of violating section
573.110 or 573.112 ordered by the court shall be in the amount determined by the court
necessary to compensate the victim for the mental and physical rehabilitation of the
victim, any lost income or educational disruption, relocation or housing assistance for
the victim, or costs for removal of the image from any computer, computer program,
interactive computer service as such term is defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 230(f)(2),
provider of public mobile services or private mobile radio services, or
telecommunications network or broadband provider.
573.215. 1. A person commits the offense of failure to report child [pornography]
sexual abuse material if he or she being a film and photographic print processor, computer
provider, installer or repair person, or any internet service provider who has knowledge of or
observes, within the scope of the person's professional capacity or employment, any film,
photograph, videotape, negative, slide, or computer-generated image or picture depicting a
child under eighteen years of age engaged in an act of sexual conduct fails to report such
instance to any law enforcement agency immediately or as soon as practically possible.
2. The offense of failure to report child [pornography] sexual abuse material is a
class B misdemeanor.
3. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a provider of electronic
communication services or remote computing services to monitor any user, subscriber or

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 59
customer of the provider, or the content of any communication of any user, subscriber or
customer of the provider.
573.570. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Depicted individual", an individual who, as a result of digitization or by
means of digital manipulation, appears in whole or in part in an intimate digital
depiction and who is identifiable by virtue of the individual's face, likeness, or other
distinguishing characteristic, such as a unique birthmark or other recognizable feature,
or from information displayed in connection with the digital depiction;
(2) "Digital depiction", a realistic visual depiction of an individual that has been
created or altered using digital manipulation;
(3) "Information content providers", any person or entity that is responsible, in
whole or in part, for the creation or development of information provided through the
internet or any other interactive computer service;
(4) "Intimate digital depiction", a digital depiction of an individual that has been
created or altered using digital manipulation and that depicts:
(a) The uncovered genitals, pubic area, anus, or postpubescent female nipple of
an identifiable individual;
(b) The display or transfer of bodily sexual fluids:
a. Onto any part of the body of an identifiable individual; or
b. From the body of an identifiable individual; or
(c) An identifiable individual engaging in sexually explicit conduct;
(5) "Sexually explicit conduct", actual or simulated:
(a) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or
oral-anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex;
(b) Bestiality;
(c) Masturbation;
(d) Sadistic or masochistic abuse; or
(e) Lascivious exhibition of the genitals or pubic area of any person.
2. A person commits the offense of disclosure of an intimate digital depiction if
the person:
(1) Discloses an intimate digital depiction:
(a) With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten, alarm, or cause substantial harm
to the finances or reputation of the depicted individual; or
(b) With the actual knowledge that, or reckless disregard for whether, such
disclosure will cause physical, emotional, reputational, or economic harm to the
depicted individual; or
(2) Threatens to disclose an intimate digital depiction:

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 60
(a) With the intent to harass, annoy, threaten, alarm, or cause substantial harm
to the finances or reputation of the depicted individual; or
(b) With the actual knowledge that, or reckless disregard for whether, such
threatened disclosure will cause physical, emotional, reputational, or economic harm to
the depicted individual.
3. (1) A violation of subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section shall be a class
D felony.
(2) A violation of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section shall be a class E
felony.
(3) A violation of subsection 2 of this section shall be a class C felony if:
(a) The violation is a second or other subsequent violation of subsection 2 of this
section; or
(b) The violation is such that the digital depiction could be reasonably expected
to:
a. Affect the conduct of any administrative, legislative, or judicial proceeding of
a federal, state, local, or tribal government agency, including the administration of an
election or the conduct of foreign relations; or
b. Facilitate violence.
4. It shall not be a defense to an offense of disclosure of an intimate digital
depiction under this section that there is a disclaimer stating that the intimate digital
depiction of the depicted individual was unauthorized or that the depicted individual
did not participate in the creation or development of the digital depiction.
5. For the purposes of this section, a provider of an interactive computer service
shall not be held to have committed the offense of disclosure of an intimate digital
depiction due to:
(1) Any action voluntarily taken in good faith to restrict access to or availability
of intimate digital depictions; or
(2) Any action taken to enable or make available to information content
providers or other persons the technical means to restrict access to intimate digital
depictions.
573.575. 1. A person commits the offense of sadistic online exploitation if he or
she:
(1) Uses the internet to manipulate, intimidate, hurt, scare, control, or threaten a
victim to undergo suffering through forcing their submission, use of violence, self-harm,
or destruction for sadistic or sinister purposes;
(2) Coerces a victim into performing self-harm, animal harm, harming another
person, sharing person information, or suicidal actions or ideations;

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 61
(3) Uses non-physical forms of coercion, manipulation, shame or fear to extort
another person into providing sexually explicit content then using such content to
further extort, threaten, or control the victim; or
(4) Uses intimate depictions as devices to threaten or coerce a victim by
demanding any kind of financial gain.
2. The offense of sadistic online exploitation shall be a class E felony.
589.015. As used in sections 589.010 to 589.040:
(1) The term "center" shall mean the state center for the prevention and control of
sexual assault established pursuant to section 589.030;
(2) The term "sexual assault" shall include:
(a) The acts of rape in the first or second degree, forcible rape, rape, statutory rape in
the first degree, statutory rape in the second degree, sexual assault, sodomy in the first or
second degree, forcible sodomy, sodomy, statutory sodomy in the first degree, statutory
sodomy in the second degree, child molestation in the first, second, third, or fourth degree,
deviate sexual assault, sexual misconduct, sexual misconduct in the first, second, or third
degree, sexual abuse, and sexual abuse in the first or second degree, or attempts to commit
any of the aforesaid, as these acts are defined in chapter 566;
(b) The act of incest, as this act is defined in section 568.020;
(c) The act of abuse of a child under section 568.060, which involves sexual contact;
(d) The act of use of a child in a sexual performance; and
(e) The act of enticement of a child as it existed prior to August 28, 2026, grooming
or enticement of a minor, as defined in section 566.151, or any attempt to commit such act.
589.042. The court or the parole board shall have the authority to require a person
who is required to register as a sexual offender under sections 589.400 to 589.425 to give his
or her assigned probation or parole officer access to his or her personal home computer as a
condition of probation or parole in order to monitor and prevent such offender from obtaining
and keeping child [pornography] sexual abuse materialor from committing an offense under
chapter 566. Such access shall allow the probation or parole officer to view the internet use
history, computer hardware, and computer software of any computer, including a laptop
computer, that the offender owns.
589.400. 1. Sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall apply to:
(1) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is hereafter adjudicated for an
offense referenced in section 589.414, unless such person is exempt from registering under
subsection 9 or 10 of this section or section 589.401;
(2) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been or is hereafter convicted of, been
found guilty of, or pled guilty or nolo contendere to committing, attempting to commit, or
conspiring to commit one or more of the following offenses: kidnapping or kidnapping in the

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 62
first degree when the victim was a child and the defendant was not a parent or guardian of the
child; abuse of a child under section 568.060 when such abuse is sexual in nature; felonious
restraint or kidnapping in the second degree when the victim was a child and the defendant is
not a parent or guardian of the child; sexual contact or sexual intercourse with a resident of a
nursing home or sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the
first or second degree; endangering the welfare of a child under section 568.045 when the
endangerment is sexual in nature; genital mutilation of a female child, under section 568.065;
promoting prostitution in the first degree; promoting prostitution in the second degree;
promoting prostitution in the third degree; sexual exploitation of a minor; promoting child
pornography in the first degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026; promoting child
sexual abuse material in the first degree; promoting child pornography in the second
degree as it existed prior to August 28, 2026; promoting child sexual abuse material in
the second degree; possession of child pornography as it existed prior to August 28, 2026;
possession of child sexual abuse material; furnishing pornographic material to minors;
public display of explicit sexual material; coercing acceptance of obscene material; promoting
obscenity in the first degree; promoting pornography for minors or obscenity in the second
degree; incest; use of a child in a sexual performance; or promoting sexual performance by a
child; patronizing prostitution if the individual the person patronizes is less than eighteen
years of age; grooming of a minor; nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual
images; or threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images;
(3) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been committed to the department of
mental health as a criminal sexual psychopath;
(4) Any person who, since July 1, 1979, has been found not guilty as a result of
mental disease or defect of any offense referenced in section 589.414;
(5) Any juvenile certified as an adult and transferred to a court of general jurisdiction
who has been adjudicated for an offense listed under section 589.414;
(6) Any juvenile fourteen years of age or older at the time of the offense who has
been adjudicated for an offense which is equal to or more severe than aggravated sexual abuse
under 18 U.S.C. Section 2241, which shall include any attempt or conspiracy to commit such
offense;
(7) Any person who is a resident of this state who has, since July 1, 1979, been or is
hereafter adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country,
or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense which, if committed in this state,
would constitute an offense listed under section 589.414, or has been or is required to register
in another state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has been or is
required to register under tribal, federal, or military law; or

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 63
(8) Any person who has been or is required to register in another state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or has been or is required to register under tribal,
federal, or military law and who works or attends an educational institution, whether public or
private in nature, including any secondary school, trade school, professional school, or
institution of higher education on a full-time or on a part-time basis or has a temporary
residence in Missouri. "Part-time" in this subdivision means for more than seven days in any
twelve-month period.
2. Any person to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425 apply shall, within three business
days of adjudication, release from incarceration, or placement upon probation, register with
the chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within a county in which such
person resides unless such person has already registered in that county for the same offense.
For any juvenile under subdivision (6) of subsection 1 of this section, within three business
days of adjudication or release from commitment to the division of youth services, the
department of mental health, or other placement, such juvenile shall register with the chief
law enforcement official of the county or city not within a county in which he or she resides
unless he or she has already registered in such county or city not within a county for the same
offense. Any person to whom sections 589.400 to 589.425 apply if not currently registered in
their county of residence shall register with the chief law enforcement official of such county
or city not within a county within three business days. The chief law enforcement official
shall forward a copy of the registration form required by section 589.407 to a city, town,
village, or campus law enforcement agency located within the county of the chief law
enforcement official.
3. The registration requirements of sections 589.400 through 589.425 shall be as
provided under subsection 4 of this section unless:
(1) All offenses requiring registration are reversed, vacated, or set aside;
(2) The registrant is no longer required to register and his or her name shall be
removed from the registry under the provisions of section 589.414; or
(3) The court orders the removal or exemption of such person from the registry under
section 589.401.
4. The registration requirements shall be as follows:
(1) Fifteen years if the offender is a tier I sex offender as provided under section
589.414;
(2) Twenty-five years if the offender is a tier II sex offender as provided under section
589.414; or
(3) The life of the offender if the offender is a tier III sex offender.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 64
5. (1) The registration period shall be reduced as described in subdivision (3) of this
subsection for a sex offender who maintains a clean record for the periods described under
subdivision (2) of this subsection by:
(a) Not being adjudicated of any offense for which imprisonment for more than one
year may be imposed;
(b) Not being adjudicated of any sex offense;
(c) Successfully completing any periods of supervised release, probation, or parole;
and
(d) Successfully completing an appropriate sex offender treatment program certified
by the attorney general.
(2) In the case of a:
(a) Tier I sex offender, the period during which the clean record shall be maintained is
ten years;
(b) Tier III sex offender adjudicated delinquent for the offense which required
registration in a sex offender registry under sections 589.400 to 589.425, the period during
which the clean record shall be maintained is twenty-five years.
(3) In the case of a:
(a) Tier I sex offender, the reduction is five years;
(b) Tier III sex offender adjudicated delinquent, the reduction is from life to that
period for which the clean record under paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of this subsection is
maintained.
100 6. For processing an initial sex offender registration the chief law enforcement officer
101 of the county or city not within a county may charge the offender registering a fee of up to ten
102 dollars.
103 7. For processing any change in registration required pursuant to section 589.414 the
104 chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within a county may charge the person
105 changing their registration a fee of five dollars for each change made after the initial
106 registration.
107 8. Any person currently on the sexual offender registry or who otherwise would be
108 required to register for being adjudicated for the offense of felonious restraint of a nonsexual
109 nature when the victim was a child and he or she was the parent or guardian of the child,
110 nonsexual child abuse that was committed under section 568.060, or kidnapping of a
111 nonsexual nature when the victim was a child and he or she was the parent or guardian of the
112 child shall be removed from the registry. However, such person shall remain on the sexual
113 offender registry for any other offense for which he or she is required to register under
114 sections 589.400 to 589.425.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 65
115 9. The following persons shall be exempt from registering as a sexual offender upon
116 petition to the court of jurisdiction under section 589.401; except that, such person shall
117 remain on the sexual offender registry for any other offense for which he or she is required to
118 register under sections 589.400 to 589.425:
119 (1) Any person currently on the sexual offender registry or who otherwise would be
120 required to register for a sexual offense involving:
121 (a) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the victim or
122 any other individual involved, if the victim was an adult, unless the adult was under the
123 custodial authority of the offender at the time of the offense; or
124 (b) Sexual conduct where no force or threat of force was directed toward the victim,
125 the victim was at least fourteen years of age, and the offender was not more than four years
126 older than the victim at the time of the offense; or
127 (2) Any person currently required to register for the following sexual offenses:
128 (a) Promoting obscenity in the first degree under section 573.020;
129 (b) Promoting obscenity in the second degree under section 573.030;
130 (c) Furnishing pornographic materials to minors under section 573.040;
131 (d) Public display of explicit sexual material under section 573.060;
132 (e) Coercing acceptance of obscene material under section 573.065;
133 (f) Trafficking for the purpose of slavery, involuntary servitude, peonage, or forced
134 labor under section 566.206;
135 (g) Abusing an individual through forced labor under section 566.203;
136 (h) Contributing to human trafficking through the misuse of documentation under
137 section 566.215; or
138 (i) Acting as an international marriage broker and failing to provide the information
139 and notice as required under section 578.475.
140 10. Any person currently on the sexual offender registry for having been adjudicated
141 for a tier I or II offense or adjudicated delinquent for a tier III offense or other comparable
142 offenses listed under section 589.414 may file a petition under section 589.401.
143 11. Any nonresident worker, including work as a volunteer or intern, or nonresident
144 student shall register for the duration of such person's employment, including participation as
145 a volunteer or intern, or attendance at any school of higher education whether public or
146 private, including any secondary school, trade school, professional school, or institution of
147 higher education on a full-time or part-time basis in this state unless granted relief under
148 section 589.401. Any registered offender shall provide information regarding any place in
149 which the offender is staying when away from his or her residence for seven or more days,
150 including the period of time the offender is staying in such place. Any registered offender
151 from another state who has a temporary residence in this state and resides more than seven

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 66
152 days in a twelve-month period shall register for the duration of such person's temporary
153 residency unless granted relief under section 589.401.
589.414. 1. Any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register shall,
within three business days, appear in person to the chief law enforcement officer of the
county or city not within a county if there is a change to any of the following information:
(1) Name;
(2) Residence;
(3) Employment, including status as a volunteer or intern;
(4) Student status; or
(5) A termination to any of the items listed in this subsection.
2. Any person required to register under sections 589.400 to 589.425 shall, within
three business days, notify the chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within
a county of any changes to the following information:
(1) Vehicle information;
(2) Temporary lodging information;
(3) Temporary residence information;
(4) Email addresses, instant messaging addresses, and any other designations used in
internet communications, postings, or telephone communications; or
(5) Telephone or other cellular number, including any new forms of electronic
communication.
3. The chief law enforcement official in the county or city not within a county shall
immediately forward the registration changes described under subsections 1 and 2 of this
section to the Missouri state highway patrol within three business days.
4. If any person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register changes such
person's residence or address to a different county or city not within a county, the person shall
appear in person and shall inform both the chief law enforcement official with whom the
person last registered and the chief law enforcement official of the county or city not within a
county having jurisdiction over the new residence or address in writing within three business
days of such new address and phone number, if the phone number is also changed. If any
person required by sections 589.400 to 589.425 to register changes his or her state, territory,
the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of
residence, the person shall appear in person and shall inform both the chief law enforcement
official with whom the person was last registered and the chief law enforcement official of the
area in the new state, territory, the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal,
or military jurisdiction having jurisdiction over the new residence or address within three
business days of such new address. Whenever a registrant changes residence, the chief law
enforcement official of the county or city not within a county where the person was

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 67
previously registered shall inform the Missouri state highway patrol of the change within
three business days. When the registrant is changing the residence to a new state, territory,
the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction, the
Missouri state highway patrol shall inform the responsible official in the new state, territory,
the District of Columbia, or foreign country, or federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of
residence within three business days.
5. Tier I sexual offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 4 of this
section, shall report in person to the chief law enforcement official annually in the month of
their birth to verify the information contained in their statement made pursuant to section
589.407. Tier I sexual offenders include:
(1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the offense of:
(a) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is eighteen
years of age or older;
(b) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first offense
and the punishment is less than one year;
(c) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the punishment is less
than a year;
(d) Kidnapping in the second degree under section 565.120 with sexual motivation;
(e) Kidnapping in the third degree under section 565.130;
(f) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first
degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is less than one year;
(g) Sexual conduct under section 566.116 with a nursing facility resident or
vulnerable person;
(h) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or offender] conduct in the course of public duty
under section 566.145 if the victim is eighteen years of age or older;
(i) Sex with an animal under section 566.111;
(j) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the
victim is eighteen years of age or older;
(k) Possession of child pornography under section 573.037 as it existed prior to
August 28, 2026;
(l) Possession of child sexual abuse material under section 573.037;
(m) Sexual misconduct in the first degree under section 566.093;
[(m)] (n) Sexual misconduct in the second degree under section 566.095;
[(n)] (o) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068 as it existed
prior to January 1, 2017, if the punishment is less than one year; [or
(o)] (p) Invasion of privacy under section 565.252 if the victim is less than eighteen
years of age; or

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 68
(q) Grooming of a minor under section 566.152;
(2) Any offender who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the
District of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction of an
offense of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to the tier I sexual
offenses listed in this subsection or, if not comparable to those in this subsection, comparable
to those described as tier I offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act,
Title I of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
6. Tier II sexual offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 4 of this
section, shall report semiannually in person in the month of their birth and six months
thereafter to the chief law enforcement official to verify the information contained in their
statement made pursuant to section 589.407. Tier II sexual offenders include:
(1) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the offense of:
(a) Statutory sodomy in the second degree under section 566.064 if the victim is
sixteen to seventeen years of age;
(b) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is
between thirteen and fourteen years of age;
(c) Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is thirteen to
seventeen years of age;
(d) Enticement of a child under section 566.151;
(e) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and the
victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
(f) Sexual exploitation of a minor under section 573.023;
(g) Promoting child pornography in the first degree under section 573.025 as it
existed prior to August 28, 2026;
(h) Promoting child sexual abuse material in the first degree under section
573.025;
(i) Promoting child pornography in the second degree under section 573.035 as it
100 existed prior to August 28, 2026;
101 (j) Promoting child sexual abuse material in the second degree under section
102 573.035;
103 [(i)] (k) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030;
104 [(j)] (l) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or offender] conduct in the course of public
105 duty under section 566.145 if the victim is thirteen to seventeen years of age;
106 [(k)] (m) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
107 thirteen to seventeen years of age;
108 [(l)] (n) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if it is a first
109 offense and the penalty is a term of imprisonment of more than a year; [or

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 69
110 (m)] (o) Age misrepresentation with intent to solicit a minor under section 566.153;
111 (p) Nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images under section 573.110
112 if the victim is seventeen years of age or under or if coercion of the victim was sexual in
113 nature; or
114 (q) Threatening the nonconsensual dissemination of private sexual images under
115 section 573.112 if the victim is seventeen years of age or under or if coercion of the
116 victim was sexual in nature;
117 (2) Any person who is adjudicated of an offense comparable to a tier I offense listed
118 in this section or failure to register offense under section 589.425 or comparable out-of-state
119 failure to register offense and who is already required to register as a tier I offender due to
120 having been adjudicated of a tier I offense on a previous occasion; or
121 (3) Any person who is or has been adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District
122 of Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense
123 of a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to the tier II sexual offenses
124 listed in this subsection or, if not comparable to those in this subsection, comparable to those
125 described as tier II offenses under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I
126 of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248.
127 7. Tier III sexual offenders, in addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 4 of
128 this section, shall report in person to the chief law enforcement official every ninety days to
129 verify the information contained in their statement made under section 589.407. Tier III
130 sexual offenders include:
131 (1) Any offender registered as a predatory [sexual offender as defined in section
132 566.123 or a] or persistent sexual offender as defined in section [566.124] 566.125;
133 (2) Any offender who has been adjudicated for the crime of:
134 (a) Rape in the first degree under section 566.030;
135 (b) Statutory rape in the first degree under section 566.032;
136 (c) Rape in the second degree under section 566.031;
137 (d) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section 568.045 if the
138 offense is sexual in nature;
139 (e) Sodomy in the first degree under section 566.060;
140 (f) Statutory sodomy under section 566.062;
141 (g) Statutory sodomy under section 566.064 if the victim is under sixteen years of
142 age;
143 (h) Sodomy in the second degree under section 566.061;
144 (i) Sexual misconduct involving a child under section 566.083 if the offense is a
145 second or subsequent offense;

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 70
146 (j) Sexual abuse in the first degree under section 566.100 if the victim is under
147 thirteen years of age;
148 (k) Kidnapping in the first degree under section 565.110 if the victim is under
149 eighteen years of age, excluding kidnapping by a parent or guardian;
150 (l) Child kidnapping under section 565.115;
151 (m) Sexual conduct with a nursing facility resident or vulnerable person in the first
152 degree under section 566.115 if the punishment is greater than a year;
153 (n) Incest under section 568.020;
154 (o) Endangering the welfare of a child in the first degree under section 568.045 with
155 sexual intercourse or deviate sexual intercourse with a victim under eighteen years of age;
156 (p) Child molestation in the first degree under section 566.067;
157 (q) Child molestation in the second degree under section 566.068;
158 (r) Child molestation in the third degree under section 566.069 if the victim is under
159 thirteen years of age;
160 (s) Promoting prostitution in the first degree under section 567.050 if the victim is
161 under eighteen years of age;
162 (t) Promoting prostitution in the second degree under section 567.060 if the victim is
163 under eighteen years of age;
164 (u) Promoting prostitution in the third degree under section 567.070 if the victim is
165 under eighteen years of age;
166 (v) Promoting travel for prostitution under section 567.085 if the victim is under
167 eighteen years of age;
168 (w) Trafficking for the purpose of sexual exploitation under section 566.209 if the
169 victim is under eighteen years of age;
170 (x) Sexual trafficking of a child in the first degree under section 566.210;
171 (y) Sexual trafficking of a child in the second degree under section 566.211;
172 (z) Genital mutilation of a female child under section 568.065;
173 (aa) Statutory rape in the second degree under section 566.034;
174 (bb) Child molestation in the fourth degree under section 566.071 if the victim is
175 under thirteen years of age;
176 (cc) Sexual abuse in the second degree under section 566.101 if the penalty is a term
177 of imprisonment of more than a year;
178 (dd) Patronizing prostitution under section 567.030 if the offender is a persistent
179 offender;
180 (ee) Abuse of a child under section 568.060 if the offense is of a sexual nature and the
181 victim is under thirteen years of age;

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 71
182 (ff) Sexual [contact with a prisoner or offender] conduct in the course of public
183 duty under section 566.145 if the victim is under thirteen years of age;
184 (gg) [Sexual intercourse with a prisoner or offender under section 566.145;
185 (hh)] Sexual contact with a student under section 566.086 if the victim is under
186 thirteen years of age;
187 [(ii)] (hh) Use of a child in a sexual performance under section 573.200; or
188 [(jj)] (ii) Promoting a sexual performance by a child under section 573.205;
189 (3) Any offender who is adjudicated for a crime comparable to a tier I or tier II
190 offense listed in this section or failure to register offense under section 589.425, or other
191 comparable out-of-state failure to register offense, who has been or is already required to
192 register as a tier II offender because of having been adjudicated for a tier II offense, two tier I
193 offenses, or combination of a tier I offense and failure to register offense, on a previous
194 occasion;
195 (4) Any offender who is adjudicated in any other state, territory, the District of
196 Columbia, or foreign country, or under federal, tribal, or military jurisdiction for an offense of
197 a sexual nature or with a sexual element that is comparable to a tier III offense listed in this
198 section or a tier III offense under the Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act, Title I
199 of the Adam Walsh Child Protection and Safety Act of 2006, Pub. L. 109-248; or
200 (5) Any offender who is adjudicated in Missouri for any offense of a sexual nature
201 requiring registration under sections 589.400 to 589.425 that is not classified as a tier I or tier
202 II offense in this section.
203 8. In addition to the requirements of subsections 1 to 7 of this section, all Missouri
204 registrants who work, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern, or attend any school whether
205 public or private, including any secondary school, trade school, professional school, or
206 institution of higher education, on a full-time or part-time basis or have a temporary residence
207 in this state shall be required to report in person to the chief law enforcement officer in the
208 area of the state where they work, including as a volunteer or unpaid intern, or attend any
209 school or training and register in that state. "Part-time" in this subsection means for more
210 than seven days in any twelve-month period.
211 9. If a person who is required to register as a sexual offender under sections 589.400
212 to 589.425 changes or obtains a new online identifier as defined in section 43.651, the person
213 shall report such information in the same manner as a change of residence before using such
214 online identifier.
590.050. 1. (1) The POST commission shall establish requirements for the
continuing education of all peace officers.
(2) Each peace officer shall be required to receive two hours of sex and human
trafficking training consistent with the guidelines established in section 210.1505 within

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 72
the law enforcement continuing education one-year reporting period. The provisions of
this subdivision shall become effective on January 1, 2027, and shall expire on December
31, 2031.
(3) Peace officers who make traffic stops shall be required to receive three hours of
training within the law enforcement continuing education three-year reporting period
concerning the prohibition against racial profiling and such training shall promote
understanding and respect for racial and cultural differences and the use of effective,
noncombative methods for carrying out law enforcement duties in a racially and culturally
diverse environment.
2. The director shall license continuing education providers and may probate, suspend
and revoke such licenses upon written notice stating the reasons for such action. Any person
aggrieved by a decision of the director pursuant to this subsection may appeal as provided in
chapter 536.
3. The costs of continuing law enforcement education shall be reimbursed in part by
moneys from the peace officer standards and training commission fund created in section
590.178, subject to availability of funds, except that no such funds shall be used for the
training of any person not actively commissioned or employed by a county or municipal law
enforcement agency.
4. The director may engage in any activity intended to further the professionalism of
peace officers through training and education, including the provision of specialized training
through the department of public safety.
595.045. 1. There is established in the state treasury the "Crime Victims'
Compensation Fund". A surcharge of seven dollars and fifty cents shall be assessed as costs
in each court proceeding filed in any court in the state in all criminal cases including
violations of any county ordinance or any violation of criminal or traffic laws of the state,
including an infraction and violation of a municipal ordinance; except that no such fee shall
be collected in any proceeding in any court when the proceeding or the defendant has been
dismissed by the court or when costs are to be paid by the state, county, or municipality. A
surcharge of seven dollars and fifty cents shall be assessed as costs in a juvenile court
proceeding in which a child is found by the court to come within the applicable provisions of
subdivision (3) of subsection 1 of section 211.031.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the moneys collected
by clerks of the courts pursuant to the provisions of subsection 1 of this section shall be
collected and disbursed in accordance with sections 488.010 to 488.020 and shall be payable
to the director of the department of revenue.
3. The director of revenue shall deposit annually the amount of two hundred fifty
thousand dollars to the state forensic laboratory account administered by the department of

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 73
public safety to provide financial assistance to defray expenses of crime laboratories if such
analytical laboratories are registered with the federal Drug Enforcement Agency or the
Missouri department of health and senior services. Subject to appropriations made therefor,
such funds shall be distributed by the department of public safety to the crime laboratories
serving the courts of this state making analysis of a controlled substance or analysis of blood,
breath or urine in relation to a court proceeding.
4. The remaining funds collected under subsection 1 of this section shall be denoted
to the payment of an annual appropriation for the administrative and operational costs of the
office for victims of crime and, if a statewide automated crime victim notification system is
established pursuant to section 650.310, to the monthly payment of expenditures actually
incurred in the operation of such system. Additional remaining funds shall be subject to the
following provisions:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of revenue or the director's designee shall
determine the balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund available to
satisfy the amount of compensation payable pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075,
excluding sections 595.050 and 595.055;
(2) Beginning on September 1, 2004, and on the first of each month, the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds available
to the credit of the crime victims' compensation fund and fifty percent to the services to
victims' fund established in section 595.100.
5. The director of revenue or such director's designee shall at least monthly report the
moneys paid pursuant to this section into the crime victims' compensation fund and the
services to victims fund to the department of public safety.
6. The moneys collected by clerks of municipal courts pursuant to subsection 1 of this
section shall be collected and disbursed as provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020. Five
percent of such moneys shall be payable to the city treasury of the city from which such funds
were collected. The remaining ninety-five percent of such moneys shall be payable to the
director of revenue. The funds received by the director of revenue pursuant to this subsection
shall be distributed as follows:
(1) On the first of every month, the director of revenue or the director's designee shall
determine the balance of the funds in the crime victims' compensation fund available to
satisfy the amount of compensation payable pursuant to sections 595.010 to 595.075,
excluding sections 595.050 and 595.055;
(2) Beginning on September 1, 2004, and on the first of each month the director of
revenue or the director's designee shall deposit fifty percent of the balance of funds available
to the credit of the crime victims' compensation fund and fifty percent to the services to
victims' fund established in section 595.100.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 74
7. These funds shall be subject to a biennial audit by the Missouri state auditor. Such
audit shall include all records associated with crime victims' compensation funds collected,
held or disbursed by any state agency.
8. In addition to the moneys collected pursuant to subsection 1 of this section, the
court shall enter a judgment in favor of the state of Missouri, payable to the crime victims'
compensation fund, of sixty-eight dollars upon a plea of guilty or a finding of guilt for a class
A or B felony; forty-six dollars upon a plea of guilty or finding of guilt for a class C, D, or E
felony; five hundred dollars but not more than five thousand dollars upon a plea of
guilty or a finding of guilt for the offense of nonconsensual dissemination of private
sexual images under section 573.110 or the offense of threatening the nonconsensual
dissemination of private sexual images under section 573.112; and ten dollars upon a plea
of guilty or a finding of guilt for any misdemeanor under Missouri law except for those in
chapter 252 relating to fish and game, chapter 302 relating to drivers' and commercial drivers'
license, chapter 303 relating to motor vehicle financial responsibility, chapter 304 relating to
traffic regulations, chapter 306 relating to watercraft regulation and licensing, and chapter 307
relating to vehicle equipment regulations. Any clerk of the court receiving moneys pursuant
to such judgments shall collect and disburse such crime victims' compensation judgments in
the manner provided by sections 488.010 to 488.020. Such funds shall be payable to the state
treasury and deposited to the credit of the crime victims' compensation fund.
9. The clerk of the court processing such funds shall maintain records of all
dispositions described in subsection 1 of this section and all dispositions where a judgment
has been entered against a defendant in favor of the state of Missouri in accordance with this
section; all payments made on judgments for alcohol-related traffic offenses; and any
judgment or portion of a judgment entered but not collected. These records shall be subject to
audit by the state auditor. The clerk of each court transmitting such funds shall report
separately the amount of dollars collected on judgments entered for alcohol-related traffic
offenses from other crime victims' compensation collections or services to victims
collections.
10. The department of revenue shall maintain records of funds transmitted to the
crime victims' compensation fund by each reporting court and collections pursuant to
subsection 16 of this section and shall maintain separate records of collection for alcohol-
related offenses.
11. The state courts administrator shall include in the annual report required by
section 476.350 the circuit court caseloads and the number of crime victims' compensation
judgments entered.
12. All awards made to injured victims under sections 595.010 to 595.105 and all
appropriations for administration of sections 595.010 to 595.105, except sections 595.050 and

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 75
595.055, shall be made from the crime victims' compensation fund. Any unexpended balance
remaining in the crime victims' compensation fund at the end of each biennium shall not be
subject to the provision of section 33.080 requiring the transfer of such unexpended balance
to the ordinary revenue fund of the state, but shall remain in the crime victims' compensation
fund. In the event that there are insufficient funds in the crime victims' compensation fund to
pay all claims in full, all claims shall be paid on a pro rata basis. If there are no funds in the
crime victims' compensation fund, then no claim shall be paid until funds have again
accumulated in the crime victims' compensation fund. When sufficient funds become
available from the fund, awards which have not been paid shall be paid in chronological order
100 with the oldest paid first. In the event an award was to be paid in installments and some
101 remaining installments have not been paid due to a lack of funds, then when funds do become
102 available that award shall be paid in full. All such awards on which installments remain due
103 shall be paid in full in chronological order before any other postdated award shall be paid.
104 Any award pursuant to this subsection is specifically not a claim against the state, if it cannot
105 be paid due to a lack of funds in the crime victims' compensation fund.
106 13. When judgment is entered against a defendant as provided in this section and such
107 sum, or any part thereof, remains unpaid, there shall be withheld from any disbursement,
108 payment, benefit, compensation, salary, or other transfer of money from the state of Missouri
109 to such defendant an amount equal to the unpaid amount of such judgment. Such amount
110 shall be paid forthwith to the crime victims' compensation fund and satisfaction of such
111 judgment shall be entered on the court record. Under no circumstances shall the general
112 revenue fund be used to reimburse court costs or pay for such judgment. The director of the
113 department of corrections shall have the authority to pay into the crime victims' compensation
114 fund from an offender's compensation or account the amount owed by the offender to the
115 crime victims' compensation fund, provided that the offender has failed to pay the amount
116 owed to the fund prior to entering a correctional facility of the department of corrections.
117 14. All interest earned as a result of investing funds in the crime victims'
118 compensation fund shall be paid into the crime victims' compensation fund and not into the
119 general revenue of this state.
120 15. Any person who knowingly makes a fraudulent claim or false statement in
121 connection with any claim hereunder is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
122 16. The department may receive gifts and contributions for the benefit of crime
123 victims. Such gifts and contributions shall be credited to the crime victims' compensation
124 fund as used solely for compensating victims under the provisions of sections 595.010 to
125 595.075.
610.131. 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 610.140 to the contrary, a
person who [at the time of the offense was under the age of eighteen, and] has pleaded guilty

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 76
to or has been convicted [for] of the offense of prostitution under section 567.020 may apply
to the court in which he or she pled guilty or was sentenced for an order to expunge from all
official records all recordations of his or her arrest, plea, trial, or conviction. If the court
determines that such person [was under the age of eighteen or] was acting under the coercion,
as defined in section 566.200, of an agent when committing the offense that resulted in a plea
of guilty or conviction under section 567.020, the court shall enter an order of expungement.
2. Upon granting of the order of expungement, the records and files maintained in any
administrative or court proceeding in an associate or circuit division of the circuit court under
this section shall be confidential and only available to the parties or by order of the court for
good cause shown. The effect of such order shall be to restore such person to the status he or
she occupied prior to such arrest, plea, or conviction and as if such event had never taken
place. No person as to whom such order has been entered shall be held thereafter under any
provision of any law to be guilty of perjury or otherwise giving a false statement by reason of
his or her failure to recite or acknowledge such arrest, plea, trial, conviction, or expungement
in response to any inquiry made of him or her for any purpose whatsoever and no such
inquiry shall be made for information relating to an expungement under this section.
650.120. 1. There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Cyber Crime
Investigation Fund". The treasurer shall be custodian of the fund and may approve
disbursements from the fund in accordance with sections 30.170 and 30.180. The department
of public safety shall be the administrator of the fund. Moneys in the fund shall be used
solely for the administration of the grant program established under this section.
Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys remaining in
the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the general revenue fund.
The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as other funds are
invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be credited to the fund.
2. The department of public safety shall create a program to distribute grants to
multijurisdictional internet cyber crime law enforcement task forces, multijurisdictional
enforcement groups, as defined in section 650.153, that are investigating internet sex crimes
against children, and other law enforcement agencies. The program shall be funded by the
cyber crime investigation fund created under subsection 1 of this section. Not more than
three percent of the money in the fund may be used by the department to pay the
administrative costs of the grant program. The grants shall be awarded and used to pay the
salaries of detectives and computer forensic personnel whose focus is investigating internet
sex crimes against children, including but not limited to enticement of a child as it existed
prior to August 28, 2026, grooming or enticement of a minor, possession or promotion of
child [pornography] sexual abuse material, provide funding for the training of law
enforcement personnel and prosecuting and circuit attorneys as well as their assistant

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 77
prosecuting and circuit attorneys, and purchase necessary equipment, supplies, and services.
The funding for such training may be used to cover the travel expenses of those persons
participating.
3. A panel is hereby established in the department of public safety to award grants
under this program and shall be comprised of the following members:
(1) The director of the department of public safety, or his or her designee;
(2) Two members appointed by the director of the department of public safety from a
list of six nominees submitted by the Missouri Police Chiefs Association;
(3) Two members appointed by the director of the department of public safety from a
list of six nominees submitted by the Missouri Sheriffs' Association;
(4) Two members of the state highway patrol appointed by the director of the
department of public safety from a list of six nominees submitted by the Missouri State
Troopers Association;
(5) One member of the house of representatives appointed by the speaker of the house
of representatives; and
(6) One member of the senate appointed by the president pro tem.

The panel members who are appointed under subdivisions (2), (3), and (4) of this subsection
shall serve a four-year term ending four years from the date of expiration of the term for
which his or her predecessor was appointed. However, a person appointed to fill a vacancy
prior to the expiration of such a term shall be appointed for the remainder of the term. Such
members shall hold office for the term of his or her appointment and until a successor is
appointed. The members of the panel shall receive no additional compensation but shall be
eligible for reimbursement for mileage directly related to the performance of panel duties.
4. Local matching amounts, which may include new or existing funds or in-kind
resources including but not limited to equipment or personnel, are required for
multijurisdictional internet cyber crime law enforcement task forces and other law
enforcement agencies to receive grants awarded by the panel. Such amounts shall be
determined by the state appropriations process or by the panel.
5. When awarding grants, priority should be given to newly hired detectives and
computer forensic personnel.
6. The panel shall establish minimum training standards for detectives and computer
forensic personnel participating in the grant program established in subsection 2 of this
section.
7. Multijurisdictional internet cyber crime law enforcement task forces and other law
enforcement agencies participating in the grant program established in subsection 2 of this

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 78
section shall share information and cooperate with the highway patrol and with existing
internet crimes against children task force programs.
8. The panel may make recommendations to the general assembly regarding the need
for additional resources or appropriations.
9. The power of arrest of any peace officer who is duly authorized as a member of a
multijurisdictional internet cyber crime law enforcement task force shall only be exercised
during the time such peace officer is an active member of such task force and only within the
scope of the investigation on which the task force is working. Notwithstanding other
provisions of law to the contrary, such task force officer shall have the power of arrest, as
limited in this subsection, anywhere in the state and shall provide prior notification to the
chief of police of a municipality or the sheriff of the county in which the arrest is to take
place. If exigent circumstances exist, such arrest may be made and notification shall be made
to the chief of police or sheriff as appropriate and as soon as practical. The chief of police or
sheriff may elect to work with the multijurisdictional internet cyber crime law enforcement
task force at his or her option when such task force is operating within the jurisdiction of such
chief of police or sheriff.
[10. Under section 23.253 of the Missouri sunset act:
(1) The provisions of the new program authorized under this section shall be
reauthorized on August 28, 2014, and shall expire on December 31, 2024, unless reauthorized
by an act of the general assembly; and
(2) If such program is reauthorized, the program authorized under this section shall
sunset automatically twelve years after the effective date of the reauthorization of this section;
and
(3) This section shall terminate on September first of the calendar year immediately
following the calendar year in which the program authorized under this section is sunset.]
660.520. 1. There is hereby established in the department of social services a special
team, to be known as the "state technical assistance team", to assist in cases of child abuse,
child neglect, child sexual abuse, child exploitation, child [pornography] sexual abuse
material, or child fatality. It shall be the priority of the team to focus on those cases in which
more than one report has been received. The team shall:
(1) Provide assistance, expertise, and training to child protection agencies and
multidisciplinary teams for the investigation and prosecution of child abuse, child neglect,
child sexual abuse, child exploitation, child [pornography] sexual abuse material, or child
fatality cases;
(2) Assist in the investigation of child abuse, child neglect, child sexual abuse, child
exploitation, child [pornography] sexual abuse material, or child fatality cases, upon the
request of a local, county, state, or federal law enforcement agency, county, state, or federal

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 79
prosecutor, a representative of the family courts, medical examiner, coroner, juvenile officer,
or department of social services staff. Upon being requested to assist in an investigation, the
state technical assistance team shall notify appropriate parties specified in this subdivision of
the team's involvement. State technical assistance team investigators licensed as peace
officers by the director of the department of public safety pursuant to chapter 590 shall be
deemed to be peace officers within the state of Missouri while acting in an investigation or on
behalf of a child. The power of arrest of a state technical assistance team investigator acting
as a peace officer shall be limited to offenses involving child abuse, child neglect, child
sexual abuse, child exploitation, child [pornography] sexual abuse material, child fatality, or
in situations of imminent danger to the investigator or another person;
(3) Assist county multidisciplinary teams to develop and implement protocols for the
investigation and prosecution of child abuse, child neglect, child sexual abuse, child
exploitation, child [pornography] sexual abuse material, or child fatality cases.
2. The team may call upon the expertise of the office of the attorney general, the
Missouri office of prosecution services, the state highway patrol, the department of health and
senior services, the department of mental health or any other agency or institution.
3. Each county may develop a multidisciplinary team for the purpose of determining
the appropriate investigative and therapeutic action to be initiated on complaints referenced in
subsection 1 of this section reported to the children's division. The multidisciplinary team
may include, but is not limited to, a prosecutor, or his or her representative, an investigator
from the children's division, a physician, a representative from a mental health care services
agency and a representative of the police agency of primary jurisdiction.
4. All reports and records made and maintained by the state technical assistance team
or local law enforcement relating to criminal investigations conducted pursuant to this
section, including arrests, shall be available in the same manner as law enforcement records,
as set forth in sections 610.100 to 610.200, and to the individuals identified in subdivision
(13) of subsection 2 of section 210.150. All other records shall be available in the same
manner as provided for in section 210.150.
660.845. 1. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury the "Missouri
Crime Victims Fund", which shall consist of moneys appropriated by the general
assembly and any gifts, contributions, grants, or other donations from any public or
private source. The state treasurer shall be custodian of the fund. In accordance with
sections 30.170 and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements. The fund
shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation, moneys in this fund shall be used
solely as provided in this section.

SS SCS HCS HBs 2273, 1946, 1814 & 2551 80
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080 to the contrary, any moneys
remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the fund in the same manner as
other funds are invested. Any interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
2. Moneys in the Missouri crime victims fund shall be disbursed to entitlement
jurisdictions, eligible entities, or local governmental entities that are eligible for victim
assistance grants under the federal Victims of Crime Act, Pub. L. 98-473, and related
regulations, and such jurisdictions and entities shall use such moneys for the same
purposes as an entitlement jurisdiction, eligible entity, or local governmental entity may
use victim assistance grants under the federal Victims of Crime Act, Pub. L. 98-473, and
related regulations.
✔